Authors
John Carroll
Number of Reviews
34

Title
Review for Shining, The (1980)
The Shining, starring Jack Nicholson, Shelley Duvall, Danny Lloyd and Scatman
Crothers.  Directed by Stanley Kubrick.  1980.
   In a year of the horror film, people always tend to look back at the
classics.  In a few years, people will undeniably be looking back at films such
as The Blair Witch Project and The Sixth Sense as classic horror films.  But
for now, there are other classics to look after.  The Shining, directed by the
legendary Stanley Kubrick and based on the Stephen King novel, is regarded as a
classic.  And despite being an entertaining movie, The Shining did not age
well.
   The premise for the novel is that Jack Torrance (Jack Nicholson) has become
the housekeeper for a ski lodge that is closing down for the winter.  This is
because the snow becomes to much to travel.  Right from the get-go, Kubrick
establishes the "trapped in the house" scenario that many horror films have
tried to accomplish.  The other plot involved is with Danny Torrance (Danny
Llyod).  He would be best described as a "weird" little boy, as he talks to his
imaginary friend, which turns out to be his finger.  As Kubrick later on
reveals, the boy has a sense known as "The Shining", a trait that the Overlook
Hotel chef Dick Hallorann (Scatman Crothers) also possesses.  As the film
progresses, Kubrick develops the rage and isolation in Jack Torrance.
   Jack Nicholson, as Jack Torrance, gives a wonderful performance.  In a film
that tends to drag on at certain points and become rather tedious, Nicholson
steps up and brings the film back up, despite losing it once off the screen. 
Nicholson portrays Torrance as the psychopath he truly is, and despite knowing
what will happen in the film from the start, Nicholson will have everyone
second-guessing themselves.
   The rest of the supporting cast, which basically consists of Duvall, Llyod
and Crothers, does not add many dimensions to the film.  Duvall has the role of
the nice country wife, and gives a decent performance, although has trouble
standing out, particularly when paired with Nicholson on screen.  Danny Lloyd,
the boy with "The Shining", has a particularly important role, and utterly
fails with it.  Any drama with children tends to rely on their performance for
the film's success or failure.  Films like Taxi Driver that get great
performances from their child stars, in Taxi's case, Jodie Foster, those films
tend to succeed much more than subpar child performances.  Danny Lloyd fails
miserably.  His performance is as dry as can be, with no emotion shown in any
of his lines.  He even has trouble acting like a child, when in the backseat of
the car driving up to the Overlook Hotel, he cannot even do the "Are we there
yet?" correctly.  His performance bogs the whole film down and takes away from
the great performance of Jack Nicholson and will basically bore the audience
when he makes his on-screen performance.
   Despite the terrible acting from Llyod, Kubrick still manages to piece this
film together.  As said before, Nicholson brings such a demonic presence to the
screen that you cannot help but get chills.  His good, sensible personality
goes awry right before our very eyes.  As Nicholson starts chopping down the
doors at the end of the film, the whole theatre will be on the edge of their
seats.  However, the ending goes stale.  A tedious segment develops with Jack
Torrance chasing little Danny through the garden maze and this part goes on way
too long.  I will not spoil the ending, but it is definitely not something to
write home about.  It will leave you wondering why it took an hour and a half
to get to this finale.  Nicholson works so hard to pick up the pieces left by
Llyod's atrocious acting only yo be hampered by a subpar finale.
   In the end, The Shining is an experience within itself.  While it might not
please all audiences, it is definitely a film that needs to be seen to make a
proper judgement.  The ending may not be great and Llyod may bore you to tears,
but in the end, Jack Nicholson proves why he is the best of the best and anyone
with an interest in the horror genre should pick up a copy of The Shining.
Final Verdict: B
The Movie Page- http://moviepage.hypermart.net/
Reviews, Previews, News and So Much More!

Title
Review for Civil Action, A (1998)
Big courtroom thrillers have always captivated America. O.J. Simpson, Tom
Capano, The Menendez Brothers. All these names are synonymous to Americans and
courtrooms. And, of course, courtroom dramas are not a new topic to Hollywood.
Whether it be John Grisham's thrilling novels or television's famous dramas,
the courtroom has always provided big bucks. So when I rented A Civil Action, I
was expecting the film to be like The Rainmaker, a brilliant law film that kept
viewers on the edge of their seat. However, what I saw in A Civil Action was
far different from what I expected, a major surprise, but fortunately, a
pleasant one.
John Travolta always seems to come up big when you least expect it. No one
expected him to light up the screen in Grease, nor in Saturday Night Fever.
But, whenever he gets knocked down, he always seems to come back fighting. A
Civil Action is not John's best performance, but a strong one that could rival
any performance in 1998. Travolta proves that a normal and believable
performance can vault a film into Oscar nominations. His performance is not
flashy, nor memorable, just solid. If he delivered the only solid performance,
this film would still be average. Luckily, he has a strong supporting cast.
William H. Macy is probably one of the most underrated actors in Hollywood. He
continues to deliver great performances one after the other, but he is still
regarded as a secondary actor. In A Civil Action, he delivers yet another great
performance as Travolta's paranoid and greedy accountant. He is not a lovable
character, but a character who stands out in your mind whenever you think of
the film. He is not one of the big time lawyers, just a measly accountant. But,
he delivers one of the best supporting roles of 1998, but there is actually
someone better in A Civil Action.
Robert Duvall is also an underrated actor. He gets many leading roles, but is
never heard when you hear of big box office draws like Tom Hanks, Brad Pitt and
Jim Carrey. Duvall has a supporting role in this as a lawyer of the
co-defendant. Duvall is magical in this role. He is the wise teacher, who not
only battles it out in the courtroom, but also manages to teach every major
player a lesson, in his own twisted way.
In many non-comedic films, directors are always trying to find a way to
implement a touch of comedy, to keep the audience on their toes. Unfortunately,
they usually just key in on one character whose main objective is to be funny
(Jar-Jar Binks, anyone?). However, this usually backfires because the character
is never fully developed. This is not the case in A Civil Action. They have
comedy coming from all sides. Whether it be Duvall's inane questions or Macy's
sharp anger, the laughs come in a steady pace. Granted, it's not roll in the
aisle funny, but it provides a nice addition to the film.
The plot is terrific- somewhat. The setup is nice with the film actually
starting with a victory in the courtroom. Then the case that will make or break
Jan (Travolta)'s career rears its ugly head. They find out the goldmine
involved with the case and wind up taking it. However, budgets soon flounder
and Jan finds himself in deep debt. I will not spoil the rest, although I must
speak of the one downside to the film. The courtroom debates are great, but the
actual problem they are fighting for is never fully explored. It left me
somewhat confused, although the rest of the film is terrific.
All in all, John Travolta is back yet again in this great film. His supporting
cast, consisting of Macy and Duvall, turn in tremendous performances, which
ease the load on Travolta. The film is smart, witty and thought provoking. Not
only does it gauge in-court battles, but also the various tolls it can take on
the major players. A Civil Action provides everything a drama lover craves.
The Movie Page- http://jump.to/moviepage
Reviews, Previews, News and So Much More!

Title
Review for Patch Adams (1998)
A very funny film, at least for the first half. Then it goes to a drama and is
only mediocre. Patch Adams has its moments. Then, it does not have any good
moments. This is not something you see everyday in Hollywood. Some movies
flip-flop between comedy and drama or horror throughout the film, but Patch
Adams does not do that. It actually changes around the midway point of the
film. The first half of the film is hilarious, and Robin Williams was
delivering a great comedic performance after his mediocre What Dreams May Come.
But, then things go sour.
As said before, Robin Williams is great as a doctor who wants to help patients
more then medically. He is great, at least, humorously. Then, when things "go
drama" Williams starts to disappoint. This part of the film just was not for
him. In Good Will Hunting, he showed he could be good in a drama. At least in a
supporting role. In Patch Adams, he falters. This role should have gone to
someone who could handle both clever humor and drama. 
Monica Potter, who looks exactly like Julia Roberts, delivers one of the only
straight through performances. She does nothing outstanding, but is good in her
supporting role. She is there for some humor and shines as the only actor to
stand out during Patch Adams' drama phase. 
Daniel London plays Patch's sidekick and is average. He really does nothing to
stand out in the film. The rest of the cast is basically there to set up
Williams' humor. 
The main theme throughout the film is, as Patch puts it, "You treat a disease,
you win you lose.You treat a patient, I guarantee you'll win." The humor that
starts off the first half of the film is hilarious. From Williams' plain out
humor to the gynecologist convention, the humor is fast and furious. This comes
in complete contrast to the second half of the film. When the drama half of the
film starts, it is sluggish and not as fast paced as the first half of the
film.
Williams does have some good parts when doing his drama. But, he does not lead
the way in the film. Monica Potter's part is extremely underwritten because she
is the only one to stand out during the drama part of the film. The sluggish
pace is the nail in the coffin for this film, though. If the humor in the first
half was not as quick, the sluggishness of the second half of the film would
have been acceptable. However, the sharp contrast is detectable to everyone and
it will become hard to concentrate on the film. The only time that the screen
seems to light up during Patch Adams' drama is when Monica Potter and Robin
Williams are on the screen together. Potter is basically unheard of in
Hollywood, but this role should bring her other roles. She seems to bring out
the best in Williams' acting and is the saving grace for Patch Adams. 
I had big doubts for Patch Adams heading down the homestretch. Then came the
ending. The ending was great. You might perceive it as corny and cliché but for
some reason, it caught my attention. Monica's death (sorry for spoiling it) is
truly surprising and Williams' best dramatic acting comes during his appearance
before the board.
Overall, Patch Adams is good, depending on whether you like drama or comedy. I
would like to give it a great rating, but it never decides what its main
objective is. If you like comedy, maybe you should leave after the first hour.
But, it is a decent film and I would recommend for those looking for an
"enjoyable' film.
The Movie Page- http://jump.to/moviepage
Reviews, Previews, News and So Much More!

Title
Review for Edtv (1999)
EDtv is a comic look at the premise of The Truman Show. 
Unfortunately, Ron Howard forgets the point of a comedy is to be clever and
funny.
   When I first heard about Jim Carrey in The Truman Show, it sounded
like a great basis for a comedy.  After the hilarious Liar Liar, The
Truman Show looked like a great follow-up.  Well, after I looked into it, I
found out it was a drama.  Granted, it was wonderful, but I always thought it
could have been just as good as a comedy.  Enter Ron Howard and EDtv. 
It is not exactly like The Truman Show.  The star is a man by the name
of Ed Pekurny, plyed by Matthew McConaughey.  Unlike The Truman Show, Ed
knows that the camera is following him around.  Now, this is SUPPOSED to be a
comedy.  Unfortunately, it is a snooze that I could have saved my $7.50 on.
   EDtv had great potential.  I went in with a clear mind and determined
myself not to compare it to The Truman Show...And I still hated it.  I
wanted to laugh, I really did.  I sat through all two hours thinking: "This has
to be funny.  How could they screw such a great idea up?"  But, they did.  Even
when the wacky Cliff Howard makes his cameo appearance, I could not even muster
a chuckle.  That is how bad EDtv is.  
   This film is star-packed.  I have to give it that.  You would think that
such a great cast would be able to at least bring some depth to the film, but
alas, it did not.  If anything, it made the film even worse.  You wonder how
such stars could rope themselves into such a horrendous film.  Jenna Elfman and
Woody Harrelson approach respectability, but it is not enough.  This film is
just plain bad.
   Matt McConaughey plays Ed, the star of the movie and of the show.  The
camera follows him around his life as he does his routine.  It is pretty bad at
first.  Ed turns out to be some stupid, average joe.  Then his brother, played
by Woody Harrelson, gets on screen and things are supposed to light up.  Well,
they don't.  It plods along as Ed meets Shari (Jenna Elfman) and they hit it
off and Ray (Woody Harrelson) gets mad.  It goes along slowly...Very slowly as
the relationship between Shari and Ed progresses, and then Jill enters Ed's
point of view.  Still boring.  The only good jokes in this film is the USA
Today Poll about Shari and Ed, plus the joke about nudity on the internet.  It
stops right there.
   To top things off, Ron Howard tries to add drama to this film.  One thing
you never attempt to do, Ron, is put drama in a terrible comedy.  It is hard
enough to do in a regular comedy, let alone a horrendous one such as
EDtv.  Whether it be Ed and his grandfather or Jenna and Ed in their
romance, which seems like slow motion, it all just seems to put EDtv
further and further down.  I see EDtv as a funeral.  They had a good
idea, but just kept shoveling more and more dirt on it and taking away the
glimmer.
   Overall, EDtv is just plain BAD.  The idea was great, but the
execution was horrible.  EDtv should be a lesson to all motion picture
executives: If you have a great idea and an all-star cast, do it right!  But,
EDtv does not, unfortunately, and we have to suffer for it.  Maybe
someone will do it right...Someday.
One Star our of Four Stars
The Movie Page- http://jump.to/moviepage
Reviews, Previews, News and So Much More!

Title
Review for Big Daddy (1999)
Big Daddy is a very enjoyable movie.  I was flipping
back and forth over the weekend trying to figure out how to review this film. 
Despite its flaws, it is still very funny and very clever.  However, its flaws
distract from the movie-going experience.  
   Adam Sandler is making his way up the ladder.  He should no longer be
regarded as a "goofball" comic.  For those of us accustomed to his
goofball antics, it is a disappointment to see him change his ways.  However,
The Wedding Singer and Big Daddy are both funny and Sandler is
not a disappointment in either.  Sandler does an admirable job as Sonny Koufax,
a lazy law school grad who won a lawsuit for $200,000 dollars and, therefore,
lounges around all day.  He works one day a week in a tollbooth and thinks he
can live this way for the rest of his life.  However, things start to change
all around him.  His girlfriend Vanessa wants him to grow up and she leaves him
for a more "mature" man.  His roommate (Jon Stewart) is leaving for
business in Asia, but before he leaves, he proposes to his girlfriend (Leslie
Mann).  Sonny hates his roommate's new fiance and cannot believe all
the changes in his life.
   Things get started as Stewart leaves the country and a child is left at
Sonny's door.  This is where the major flaws occur.  First, Stewart just
disappears. After Assuring Sonny that the child is not his son, Stewart just
disappears.  He is in the first ten minutes and the last ten minutes of the
film.  And he basically serves no purpose in either.  I have no problem with
Jon Stewart; in fact he can be quite funny.  But, he is used only as a tool to
get Sonny the child and any unknown actor could have been used.
   The other flaw is when the child, Julia, is dropped off with Sonny,
things move to fast.  They all of a sudden become great friends and Sonny
starts acting a little more civilized and mature.  These things are bothering,
but do not detract from the clever comedy in the film.  After Stewart leaves
and Sonny gets the kid, things fall into place and Sandler goes to work.
   The relationship between the child and Sonny develop nicely.  For once in
a Sandler film, there is some depth.  Sonny wants to raise the kid the way he
lives life, with the motto: "Do what you want."  But, it is great how
the plot shows maturation in Sonny through raising the kid.  But do not worry
Sandler fans, there may be a clever script and depth in the plot, but it is all
done through Sandler's humor.  Cole and Dylan Sprouse, the twin brothers who
play Julian, Sonny's adopted son, play their naive role terrifically. 
They are the perfect complement for Sandler's unpredictable comedy.  
   Joey Lauren Adams is Sandler's romance interest in the film and she turns
in a solid performance, although her role was slightly underwritten.  Rob
Schneider is great as the paranoid deliveryman.  He shows that Sandler still
knows his goofball "roots" and you can tell this is a Sandler idea. 
Schneider not only tells some great jokes himself, but he sets up Cole and
Dylan Sprouse for some of their comedy.
  Now, I was ready to give this movie a terrific rating heading into the
homestretch.  I could not even fathom the bad reviews this film was getting. 
Despite the trip-ups in the first twenty minutes of the film, the next hour
made up for it.  Then, things went sour.  Jon Stewart comes back for the ending
and things get screwed up.  After all the bonding between Sonny and the child,
Jon Stewart wins custody after realizing he was the father.  Now, you would
expect Jon to give the child to Sonny?  No, he keeps the child.  Then they all
of a sudden become good friends, Sonny starts practicing law and they end the
film as they started: with a surprise party, just Sonny is the guest of honor
this time around.  Well, this ending is just downright terrible.  How could
they do that?  They ruined a perfectly good comedy.  But, despite all of this,
I still recommend that anyone see this film.  It is funny and if your one of
these people who leaves film early, then this is the film for
you.
Two And A Half Stars our of Four Stars
The Movie Page- http://jump.to/moviepage
Reviews, Previews, News and So Much More!

Title
Review for Keeping the Faith (2000)
A REVIEW OF KEEPING THE FAITH, BY JOHN CARROLL (all reviews seen at
http://moviepage.hypermart.net/)

Keeping the Faith, starring Edward Norton, Ben Stiller, Jenna Elfman,
Anne Bancroft, Milos Forman, Ron Rifkin, Holland Taylor, Eli Wallach, Kryss
Anderson, Dagmara Dominczyk, Ken Leung, Rena Sofer and Brian Anthony Wilson. 
Directed by Edward Norton.  Written by Stuart Blumberg.  2000.
Reviewed by John Carroll.
   The first quarter of any year is bound to be horrendous, film-wise that is. 
January and February drag on into March with nothing but trash after trash
flowing into theatres.  Studios cross their fingers that a certain star or ad
campaign will catch the majority of filmgoers for a fateful weekend to secure
the box-office crown.  Up until Erin Brockovich's March 18 debut, the
theatres were putrid.  But, we finally are starting to see a turn towards the
better, with the summer build-up heading towards full tilt.  On April 14th, a
truly splendid comedy graces its way into theatres.  Keeping the Faith
is similar to 1998's You've Got Mail, but Edward Norton, who directs and
stars, takes Stuart Blumberg's script and produces a romantic comedy that
provides just as many off-beat laughs as it does gushiness.
   Keeping the Faith has a very volatile blend of drama and comedy, such
that it once and awhile detracts from the humorous experience.  The main
premise of Keeping the Faith focuses on the relationship between Father
Brian Finn (Norton), Rabbi Jake Schram (Ben Stiller) and Anna Reilly (Jenna
Elfman).  The trio were best friends during grade school, but were fractured
when Reilly moved away after eighth grade.  Over 15 years later, Anna is
returning to New York for business and the trio is reunited once again. 
Keeping the Faith goes all over the place, but manages to get sensible
laughs no matter where it travels.  Whether it be the differences between
faiths, the hypocrisy of outer-faith relationships or Edward Norton's dead on
Raymond Babbitt (Rain Man) impression, Keeping the Faith gets its
laughs cleanly and whole-heartedly.
   Keeping the Faith opens with Father Brian stumbling down the street,
drunk, and goes to a bar.  Right from the get-go, Norton establishes that this
is a comedy.  Five minutes into the film, he makes fun of the obvious "priest,
rabbi and a women" jokes that never seem to go out of style.  From this point
on, Norton never ventures into serious territory over religion or
relationships, and when he manages to tread the line, he or Ben Stiller manage
to show us the punchline in it all.
   The plot evolves from the union of the trio to the love that the priest and
rabbi share for Anna.  Schram, a rabbi constantly fixed up by his congregation,
is looking for spontaneous love, not a relationship that will just make him
look better to his peers.  Finn, a priest looking to modernize his faith,
finally finds something worth loving; a new faith that he is fully interested
in pursuing.  Through both perspectives, Norton explores what true faith really
is.  And through it all, he maintains a high level of comedy, whether it be the
perfect timing of Ben Stiller, or the off-beat comedy of minor characters like
Don (Ken Leung; Rush Hour) or T-Bone (Brian Anthony Wilson; Snake
Eyes).
The cast is harmonious.  Norton once again displays his versatility, going
from the daring Fight Club to the darling Keeping the Faith.  The
chemistry between himself and Ben Stiller is what keeps Keeping the
Faith on its toes.  Norton is not a veteran comedic actor, but being paired
with uber-comic Stiller let him learn the ropes rather quickly.  Jenna Elfman,
coming off her stellar performance in EDtv (hint: sarcasm), manages to
provide most of the romance in the film, and for the most part, lets Stiller
and Norton get the laughs.  The supporting cast is perfect, with small parts
that lend hardy laughs at key moments.  Seeing Finn pry at Schram in the audio
store got rather tedious, and at this rather dull moment, Don (Leung) makes his
first appearance, chiming away on the karaoke machine.  Keeping the
Faith stays fresh because it throws in comedy at the perfect points
throughout, while still managing to balance out the romance and faith that
ultimately end the film.  The one strong supporting member of the cast with
quite a few scenes is Anne Bancroft (The Graduate).  She lends the
veteran scars to Keeping the Faith and her neurotic role as the rabbi's
mother is delightful, extracting an "Oi Vei" from the audience at the end.
   For all of this praise, Keeping the Faith does have a few minor
detriments.  Clocking in at over 2 hours, Keeping the Faith drags on
while heading into the homestretch.  Romantic comedies are not keen for twist
endings, so watching the montages of each character does get a little tedious. 
Of course, this is the part where faith and love take over for comedy.  This
span of fifteen minutes is the one part where Blumberg forgets about the comedy
that had ruled the film.  This could have been cut down, but despite it,
Keeping the Faith still comes up on top with its charm intact.
   You've Got Mail was delightful, but Keeping the Faith steps
out of the usual path of romantic comedies by providing some all-around humor. 
It may be a great date movie, but I would highly encourage anyone to see
Keeping the Faith that is looking for some great laughs.  With
characters having names like Father, Rabbi and T-Bone, Keeping the Faith
may seem like another cheap piece of comedy, but it is anything but.  Norton
manages to keep his film distinct from any others, and in doing so, reminds the
viewer to KEEP THE FAITH in some diamonds in the rough for the first
quarter of the film year.
Final Verdict: B+
The Movie Page- http://moviepage.hypermart.net/
Reviews, Previews, News and So Much More!

Title
Review for Truman Show, The (1998)
Who would have thought? Jim Carrey does drama. When I first saw the
advertisement for The Truman Show, I thought, "What a hilarious idea for a
movie!" However, it was an even better premise for a drama.
The Truman Show takes us into a world that revolves around one man. That man is
Truman Burbank (Jim Carrey). Truman has no clue what is really going on in his
world and frankly, Cristof wants to keep it that way. Christof is the "god" of
this made-up world. He keeps everything running and gives the actors their
roles. There were a few attempts to tell Truman about his world, but they
failed and life went on as normal.
The opening parts of the film introduce to Truman's world. We see what he is
doing at his current age, then we get a flashback at his past. It may seem a
tad boring, but it is so intriguing that you will fall in love with the film
right from the start.
The film can be described in one word: weird. It seems like such a simple idea,
yet it is something that a majority of us would never think of, but Andrew
Niccol did. It seems like a warped idea, but it is Andrew's idea and he did
wonders with it.
Jim Carrey actually lived up to the hype. The hype, whether good or bad, always
focused on Carrey's ability to do drama. No one doubted how extraordinary this
film could be, the only thing they doubted was Carrey. And he showed them all
up. Jim Carrey was snubbed at the Oscars. I do not think he was the best actor,
but he deserved the nomination. He plays Truman Burbank, the unsuspecting star
of the most popular television show in the world. He has lived a normal life
for almost thirty years, but then strange things start happening. He ventures
into the wrong elevator. A light crashes in front of him. His father comes back
and is then pulled away. We are constantly teased with all of this and we know
it is a show, but Truman does not. And it is just a constant progression that
never gets sluggish. Carrey is able to shed his comedy to play a major role in
a major drama. 
Laura Linney is magnificent as the camera hungry wife. She plays her role as
advertiser and budding star to a point. Peter Weir does not make the cast
perfect, and their flaws eventually lead to Truman's escape. The story unfolds
until the show becomes too big and everything crashes down.
Despite Carrey's greatness, the best performance in The Truman Show undoubtedly
is turned in by Ed Harris, who plays the "god" of Truman's world. He displays
the pressure he is under, the world he has created. He becomes so paranoid that
he believes he is a god and that Truman has him to thank for his sham of a
life.
The action moves at a good pace, and rarely gets sluggish. But, the main point
of the film is how it looks like a television show. It really makes you think.
Maybe your brother is an actor, maybe your best friend is in heated contract
negotiations to stay on the show. Some of the best parts of the film are when
Truman ventures into the wrong elevator and sees cast members drinking coffee
and talking. Or when Truman tunes into the wrong station and hears orders being
said for Truman's arrival. And when Christof focuses in on Truman and cues the
dramatic music as Marlon (Noah Emmerich) delivers his dramatic line. All of
these ideas are just perfect for the film and extremely innovative. I was not
only enjoying the film, I was overwhelmed by genius of it. 
Overall, The Truman Show is one of the freshest and innovative films to come
out of Hollywood. Jim Carrey shows that he is not just a man of a million
faces, but a legitimate actor who could go down as one of the best. Andrew
Niccol is responsible for the screenplay and Peter Weir pulled it off to
perfection. The Truman Show is a must see for anyone who likes movies in
general because they will be thoroughly impressed by this creative film.
The Movie Page- http://jump.to/moviepage
Reviews, Previews, News and So Much More!

Title
Review for 28 Days (2000)
Reviewed by John Carroll, http://moviepage.hypermart.net/
28 Days, starring Sandra Bullock, Viggo Mortensen, Dominic West, Diane Ladd,
Elizabeth Perkings, Steve Buscemi, Alan Tudyk, Mike O'Malley, Azura Skye, Reni
Santoni, Marianne Jean-Baptiste and Margo Martindale.  Directed by Betty
Thomas.  Written by Susannah Grant.  2000.
   Will Smith has always been known as Mr. July 4th.  That is, until Wild Wild
West failed to continue Smith's wild success on the Independence Weekend.  An
equal analogy of Smith's usual success is Sandra Bullock's success during the
spring.  Forces of Nature, although critically lambasted, managed to rake in
$13.5 million and the top spot at the box office when it opened in March of
1999.  And while 28 Days's $10 million plus opening is not too shabby, it once
again shows that mediocre work does not fly far with audiences.
   28 Days is one of those delightful movies that provides you with good,
hearty laughs, only to disappoint when you finally realize the potential the
film has missed out on at the end.  The cast is a mixed bunch, with some
succeeding and some not.  Sandra Bullock, the star of the film, once again
proves her drawing power with a great performance that is only limited by the
script that confines her.  The mix of humor and drama as director Betty Thomas
examines a rehab clinic and its residents is both delightful and moving, but
continually bogged down by an unnecessary love triangle.  For some reason, the
Hollywood elite seem to insist on romantic subplots, no matter what is
happening in the main plot of the film.  Hoosiers, my favorite sports film
besides Rocky, was terrific - and would have been much better had the Gene
Hackman-Barbara Hershey romance been eliminated.  So much valuable time in 28
Days is wasted on developing a relationship that is not capable of being
understood in the first place, let alone at the end of the film.
   Sandra Bullock plays Gwen, a woman on the wild side who when asked of her
drug of choice, responds, "Do I have to choose just one?"  Gwen lives wildly,
and ultimately pays the price when she arrives at her sister's wedding on some
concoction that she cannot even decipher.  Gwen winds up in a rehab clinic, and
the comedy starts off strong.  Susannah Grant, who wrote the script, is
wittingly able to poke fun at the operations of a rehab clinic without
demeaning the actual progress that these clinics set out to achieve.  Jasper,
Gwen's boyfriend, makes his visits throughout the film.  At first, his
appearances do not represent the eventual and boring romantic subplot, but
rather, the problems that Gwen will have to confront after she completes her
rehab.  Jasper, played very sharply by Dominic West, is a great character to
have played this role.  That is, until Thomas directs his role to be that of
choice rather than that of progress.  Jasper slowly slips away from the
problems that Gwen will face when she returns to the real world into a choice
that Gwen will have to make, between Jasper and Eddie Boone (Viggo Mortenson). 
Boone turns out to be a major league pitcher, and this touch of celebritydome
was tough to swallow, but 28 Days was strong enough at that point to have faith
in this character choice.  From this point on, 28 Days slowly rolls down hill.
   Interlaced throughout 28 Days are raspy flashbacks to the childhood of Gwen
and the problems that her mother encountered, which included drugs and alcohol,
just like Gwen.  The flashbacks are logical, but horribly explained.  Thomas
and Grant automatically assume that a mother's influence will be passed down to
her offspring.  Thomas never establishes why Gwen has such a tight bond with
her mother.  Logic, which 28 Days ignores at its most critical moments, would
suggest that Gwen would be turned off to drugs and alcohol because of this
horrible experience.  Thomas never confronts this, however.  But, Gwen could
also be doomed for her mother's fate because of these experiences as well. 
While this turns out to be the outcome, Thomas never ventures into the reasons
why.  Therefore, all the audience is left with are raspy and jerky flashbacks
to a childhood that never fully connects with Gwen's adulthood.
   While 28 Days definitely has its problems, it nonetheless provides its fair
share of entertainment.  Bullock's charm gushes off of the screen, and when
Thomas focuses on the humor and intricacies of each character, the audience is
either laughing or moved, and the feeling is always justified.
   Sandra Bullock may not have a huge hit with 28 Days, but she once again
proves why she her contingency is continually growing.  Her performance is
top-notch, and if she gets a hold of a superior script, maybe she can progress
from spring into Will Smith territory...But only time will tell, but she will
definitely need more than 28 Days.
The Movie Page- http://moviepage.hypermart.net/
Reviews, Previews, News and So Much More!

Title
Review for Mystery Men (1999)
Mystery Men
Starring Ben Stiller, William H. Macy, Hank Azaria, Janeane Garofalo,
Greg Kinnear, Geoffrey Rush
120 Minutes Long, Rated PG-13 for some violence and crude humor.
Mystery Men is a very innovative and clever comedy that benefits from
a wonderful cast.
   Every summer we always get hit by the big blockbuster films that have
special effects and a big name cast.  And every summer we always see these
films get toasted by critics and never live up to their full potential.  At the
beginning of the summer, Mystery Men was shaping up to be another
blockbuster film with a great cast, and we were waiting to see if it would fail
or not.  Unfortunately, this clever comedy got lost in the mix of The Blair
Witch Project and The Sixth Sense.  What got lost was a very clever
and innovative comedy, which spoofs superhero films.
   The graphics in this film are great and add to the spoof.  They are very
colorful and outrageous, which adds to the comic book feel of the film.  It is
in a futuristic setting with Captain Amazing, played by Greg Kinnear, as the
protector of Champion City.  Then, there is the trio of Mr. Furious, The
Shoveler and The Blue Raja, played by Ben Stiller, William H. Macy and Hank
Azaria, respectively.  They are the superhero wannabes.  Things go afoul when
Captain Amazing starts to lose popularity.  He has done such a good job that
there are no superheroes left to take out.  Therefore, Captain Amazing sets up
a plan to set his arch-nemesis, Casanova Frankenstein, played by Geoffrey Rush,
free.  Chaos ensues as Casanova traps Captain Amazing and it is up to the
wannabes to help Captain Amazing.  They do some recruiting and eventually add
Invisible Boy (Kel Mitchell), The Spleen (Paul Reubens), The Bowler (Janeane
Garofalo) and The Sphinx (Wes Studi) to their team.  
   As stated before, the cast is nothing short of excellent.  Movies can
always enlist A-List celebrities, but they need to mesh in order to be
successful.  In Mystery Men, the cast blends perfectly.  Ben Stiller and
Janeane Garofalo are the perfect combination and they interact terrifically.  
Hank Azaria stands out as well as The Blue Raja, whether it be practicing his
cutlery or arguing with his mother.  William H. Macy gives another strong
performance as The Shoveler, and his demeanor and wit will have you chuckling
throughout the film.  But perhaps the funniest performances come from Paul
Reubens, a.k.a. PeeWee Herman, and Wes Studi.  Reubens plays the flatulent
Spleen and Studi plays the "prophetic" Sphinx.  These performances
are great and contrast the clever humor of the rest of the cast perfectly.
   Unlike Ben Stiller's last comedy, There's Something About Mary,
Mystery Men is a clever and innovative comedy.  It will not have you
rolling in the aisles, but you will still be impressed and laughing.  
   Are there any problems with this film?  Of course.  This could have been
a great film, but despite the two-hour length, it could have benefited by being
longer.  The script is underwritten due to the great cast.  They are so funny
they need more time.  Kinka Usher, the director of this film, tries to get each
cast member his or her own amount of screen time, which takes away from the
film.  In particular, Stiller and Macy could have used more screen time, along
with Janeane Garofalo.  Despite all of this, the rest of the cast usually
delivers with comedy when they are featured on screen.
   And the other detraction from Mystery Men is the ending.  The
spoof ends in the last ten minutes.  Instead of having a spoof ending, which
would have been funnier, they have a typical superhero ending.  In this case,
each member of the cast gets to shine in their own particular way.  This
detracts from the rest of the film considering the rest was a spoof.
   Overall, Mystery Men is a very enjoyable experience.  It is a
spoof of not only superhero films, but also blockbusters as a whole.  This may
be one of the few A-list casts that meshes together so well, so you do want to
check this film out.  Unfortunately, stiff competition from films like The
Blair Witch Project, The Sixth Sense and Runaway Bride will
keep Mystery Men from achieving the box office results that it truly
deserves.
Rating: 3 Stars Out of 4 Stars.
The Movie Page- http://jump.to/moviepage
Reviews, Previews, News and So Much More!

Title
Review for Never Been Kissed (1999)
Never Been Kissed, starring Drew Barrymore, Michael Vartan, Molly Shannon,
David Arquette, Leelee Sobieski and Garry Marshall.  Directed by Raja Gosnell. 
1999.
   In the past few years, teenage-geared movies have become all the "rage" in
Hollywood.  Starting with the wildly popular Scream, teenage films have become
a must in most studios.  However, like all fads, this one is coming to its end.
 Never Been Kissed entered the race late for the teen audience, and ironically,
had a twenty-five year-old star leading the way.  Just like the fad it was made
for, Never Been Kissed fails in all ways possible, yet somehow keeps you from
hating it, which is about the only thing it does right.
   The premise of Never Been Kissed revolves around the Chicago-Sun Times's
copy editor, Josie Geller, also known as Josie Grossie.  Her ultimate dream is
to become an investigative reporter, and when she gets her first-ever
assignment from Mr. Rigfort (Garry Marshall), she has to go back to high school
and investigate the teens that go there.  I must admit, I personally thought
this could have been a wonderful premise for a comedy, but, director Raja
Gosnell obviously was forced to aim this towards teens and Never Been Kissed
fails even before it starts.
   Drew Barrymore stars as Josie Geller, and continues her streak of "adorable"
performances.  With such a horrible script, Barrymore basically tries to carry
the film on her shoulders.  Unfortunately, the burden is too much.  Barrymore
gives Never Been Kissed only a few scents of decent laughs, and not even SNL's
Molly Shannon can get more than one laugh.  Yes, she even manages to do worse
than she did in the hideous Superstar, because she at least gave an effort in
that film.
   The rest of the cast is basically unrecognizable, and that aspect is
illuminated by their terrible performances.  David Arquette plays Rob, Josie's
brother, and despite not being that funny in the first place, Never Been Kissed
does not even capitalize on his ability to get a few stunt laughs.
   The biggest problem with Never Been Kissed is all of the ripe possibilities.
 Instead of capitalizing on the laughs that could have been gained between the
budding relationship between the student and teacher (Barrymore and Michael
Vartan), they make it serious, and do not even do that well.  Never Been Kissed
even brushes on some funny topics, like Rob dating a 16 year-old gymnast, but
instead of divulging into the topic, it is hastily resolved and ignored for the
rest of the film.
   Despite all of the gripes, and there are a lot of them, it is still hard to
hate Never Been Kissed.  Drew Barrymore has an aura about her that is able to
save a few shreds of decency for such a horrible film.  Barrymore once again
proves she can lead a film, it just seems that the rest of the world is not
ready to pay to see it.  Until Barrymore can get into another good film,
something like The Wedding Singer, which allows her to shine and get laughs,
Barrymore will continue to play second fiddle to other romantic comedies like
Notting Hill.
   While it may be hard to hate Never Been Kissed, it is still a horrible piece
of filmmaking, if it can even be called that.  Once Barrymore leaves the
screen, that hatred shoots up as fast as possible.  Unless you are a really big
Drew Barrymore fan- and I mean a BIG Barrymore fan- please stay away from Never
Been Kissed.  Rent something better, even something meaningful, like the
wonderful Life is Beautiful.
Final Verdict: D
The Movie Page- http://moviepage.hypermart.net/
Reviews, Previews, News and So Much More!

Title
Review for Hoosiers (1986)
Hoosiers, starring Gene Hackman, Dennis Hopper and Barbara Hershey.  Directed
by David Anspaugh.  1986.
   Whether good or bad, sport films always used to generate big box office
buzz.  Historic sports films, like Rocky, seem to touch everyone and become
tremendously popular.  However, sports films have become a sort of endangered
species with such big films as For Love of the Game and Mystery, Alaska not
performing up to par at the box office.  However, the sporting film genre can
always be relived through classics, and if you are in search of a classic,
please rent Hoosiers as soon as possible.
   For any sports movie to be a tremendous success, it needs to appeal to a
wide range of people.  A film like Rocky would have never been such a huge
success had it only appealed to boxing fans.  Hoosiers follows the same path,
playing more on your emotions than your fundamental knowledge of basketball.
   The film has a very simple and basic premise.  It tells the tale of a small
Indiana basketball team that goes to the State Finals.  Throughout their
journey, director David Anspaugh looks at some of the underlying subplots,
including the past of Coach Norman Dale (Gene Hackman), his relationship with
Myra Fleener (Barbara Hershey) and how the coach tries to help his team, in
particular, dealing with the fathers and cleaning up the drunk Wilbur Flatch
(Dennis Hopper).  The story has a simple David versus Goliath setup, but such
intriguing subplots and a heart-tugging journey makes Hoosiers impossible to
dislike.
   Gene Hackman plays Coach Norman Dale, a former big-time college coach.  At
first, the reason for Dale coaching at such a small high school is irrevelent,
but this story develops as the story progresses.  In fact, the only place where
Hackman fails is in his love story with Barbara Hershey.  As some films tend to
do, Anspaugh tries to cram a romantic plot into Hoosiers, but fortunately, it
only serves as a minor distraction.
   Aside from Hackman, Barbara Hershey and Dennis Hopper have the other lead
roles.  Hershey plays the guardian of the town's star player, and also evolves
as the romantic interest of Norman Dale.  She gives an adequate performance,
but considering the terrific talent surrounding her, she rarely shines as much
as she could have.  Dennis Hopper, on the other hand, gives a tremendous
performance, undoubtedly the best of the film.  He plays the drunken father of
one of the players, and is given a chance to put his basketball knowledge to
good use with Coach Norman Dale.  Hopper portrays what Hoosiers is all about. 
He is given a chance to shine, fails, but in a way, succeeds as we see him
bounce back and tighten his ties with his formerly estranged son.
   The supporting cast, aside from Hershey and Hopper, consists of the
basketball players and their fathers.  The players are on screen for a long
time, but do not have many lines.  This actually serves to help Hoosiers.  It
is always a risk to give too many lines to young and unexperienced actors, and
the basketball team is able to convey their message through their actions on
and off the court rather than through words, which makes Hoosiers all the
better.
   The journey of this team progresses without a hitch, and going into sports
films, most viewers can guess the ending.  You will watch Hoosiers with this
same attitude, yet, when the final game is taking place, the audience will
continually find themselves questioning who will win the game.  This is a true
testament to a sports films and stands out for why Hoosiers is one of the
greatest sports films to ever hit the big screen.
   In the end, the predictability and sappiness can be put aside to take a
clear look at what Hoosiers truly is: not a basketball film, but a film that
makes us look at what people can become despite the mistakes they make in life,
and that is the true message of Hoosiers.
Final Verdict: B+
The Movie Page- http://moviepage.hypermart.net/
Reviews, Previews, News and So Much More!

Title
Review for Man on the Moon (1999)
MAN ON THE MOON, starring Jim Carrey, Danny DeVito, Paul Giamatti, Courtney
Love, Jerry Lawler, David Letterman, Paul Shaffer, Judd Hirsch, Marilu Henner,
Norm McDonald, Lorne Michaels, Jim Ross, Christopher Lloyd and Carol Kane. 
Directed by Milos Forman.  1999.
   If you have seen any advertisements for Man on the Moon, you have probably
seen this tag line, whether it be the poster, soundtrack or other memorabilia
for Man on the Moon that you have seen.  Either way, I figure it is fitting for
this review.  Andy Kaufman, despite what people may think about him, is revered
among comics as one of the greatest of all time, rivaling the likes of Buster
Keaton.  Man on the Moon takes a look at his wild life, where the performance
began and never stopped.
   Andy Kaufman not only had a complex performance on stage, but had a complex
life in general.  And even as Lynne Margulies (Courtney Love) says to Andy,
"There is no real you."  And if you are looking for Man on the Moon to answer
the questions Andy always brought to the table, then you are in for a shock. 
Aside from one or two surprises, Man on the Moon just sticks to pure Andy, and
still stays just as entertaining.
   Documentary-type movies always get made based on the subject at hand. 
People will be much more intrigued by a documentary surrounding a celebrity
than a two-bit low life.  Based on that, I definitely will not be looking
forward to The John Carroll Story.  That being said, back to Man on the Moon. 
The story is obviously about comic-legend Andy Kaufman.  Kaufman is played by
Jim Carrey, who is regarded as the comic legend of the 1990s.  The resemblance
between the two is uncanny.  Carrey not only gets the look down cold, but all
of the mannerisms as well, even Kaufman's trademark "Tenk you veddy much." 
Also adding to the nostalgia is the cast of "Taxi", save Tony Danza.  All in
all, the movie accurately captures the Kaufman persona.  It has a five minute
sequence about Andy's childhood, other than that, it jumps right into Kaufman's
comedic life.
   The movie starts off like Andy Kaufman would have wanted it.  In a year with
so many innovative endings, Man on the Moon has both an innovative introduction
and a very intriguing finale.  I will not ruin them for you, but they are very
Kaufman-esque and set the standard for the entire film.
   Jim Carrey got snubbed last year for The Truman Show.  Granted, there was no
way he would have won the Oscar against the likes of Hanks and Benigni, but he
definitely deserved to be there on Oscar night.  Considering that, and the
absolutely amazing performance he gives in Man on the Moon, it would be an
absolute catastrophe if Carrey does not recieve the nomination for Man on the
Moon.  The buzz for the past few months is that Carrey IS Andy Kaufman.  It may
seem cliche', but once you see Man on the Moon, you will be saying to yourself,
"CARREY IS KAUFMAN."  The presence becomes so natural that Carrey creates
Kaufman to the extreme.  Jim Carrey gives his best performance of his career,
and could ultimately be the performance he is remembered for twenty years down
the road when he recieves some sort of Lifetime Achievement Award.  Kudos must
go to Carrey for this unbelievable talent.  Anyone who thinks The Truman Show
was a fluke will definitely be converted after witnessing Carrey in Man on the
Moon.
   Andy Kaufman is the center of this film, and due to his profession, is
probably one of the funniest dramas you will ever see.  The writers, Scott
Alexander and Larry Karaszewski, diligently stick to Kaufman's career,
recreating the comic's funniest- and most extreme- antics.  Kaufman's career
becomes much a part of the movie as does Carrey's wonderful performance.  His
on-screen presence is so demanding that the supporting cast has to fight for
screen time, but luckily, they utilize it.
   The main supporting cast that has been billed for Man on the Moon has been
Danny DeVito, who plays Andy's manager, George Shapiro, and Courtney Love, who
plays Lynne Margulies, Andy's girlfriend.  However, the most important
supporting role- and surprisingly absent from the ads- is Paul Giamatti's role
as Bob Zmuda, Andy's writer and best friend.  Giamatti gives a great
performance as the equally wacky Zmuda.  He further brings Kaufman's persona to
life as the two partners in crime continuously deviate over how to pull one
over on the crowd and to stay "one step ahead of them."
   Milos Forman, who directed such critically acclaimed hits as Amadeus and One
Flew Over the Cuckoo's Nest, helps bring Kaufman to life and Carrey to a
terrific performance.  Forman quickly moves into Andy's life and never stops. 
Just like Andy, he stays one step ahead of the audience as he intricately
swirves through the life of Andy Kaufman.
   Despite all of the supporting performances and the man behind the lens, Man
on the Moon ultimately succeeds with Jim Carrey.  Carrey is almost always on
the screen, and from this Man on the Moon benefits.  As the film progresses,
things seem out of place.  That one loose tie needs to bring everything
together.  And as Andy goes to the Phillipines to seek his "miracle," he has
the ultimate hoax played on him.  And he laughs.  And at that point, Andy
Kaufman becomes apparent.  He was not a comedian, or even a "song and dance
man" as he claimed to be.  He was an artist who was there to entertain himself,
and always do the wild, not the obvious.  But, on the final note, as Tony
Clifton belts out his version of "I Will Survive," we get hit with one more
dose of Kaufman, and despite how weird it may seem, it is a fitting ending to a
great film.
The Movie Page- http://moviepage.hypermart.net/
Reviews, Previews, News and So Much More!

Title
Review for Austin Powers: The Spy Who Shagged Me (1999)
   The Lost World.  Batman and Robin.  These movies bring
shudders to all motion picture fans, and with good reason.  What are they? 
Sequels.  The word sequel always brings one word to fans: bad.  Is it
fair to expect a sequel to live up to its original?  No, but most sequels turn
out to be terrible.  Some films have succeeded, not only at the box office like
all sequels do, but also in the plot and acting.  The Spy Who Shagged Me
is a perfect example that sequels can outdo their predecessor.
   First things first, you will not be seeing Mike Myers at the Oscars. 
The Spy Who Shagged Me is not going to be an Oscar contender, but it is
a comedy that accomplishes everything that it sets out to do.  Mike Myers not
only co-wrote the script, he also plays three different and important roles in
the film.  As in the original, he plays Austin Powers and Dr. Evil, but he also
introduces a Scottish spy known as Fat Bastard.  Unlike the original, Dr. Evil
is the main comedic attraction and he does not disappoint.  Fat Bastard is also
terrifically played by Myers.
   The Spy Who Shagged Me is basically an "evil" movie. 
The best moments of the film come from Dr. Evil and his associates.  This is
because of the excellent casting job done for the film.  First and foremost,
Dr. Evil is hilarious.  Myers establishes himself as a legitimate comedic
performer by showing that toilet humor can be original and hilarious as long as
it is done right.  Robert Wagner sets up some great jokes for Dr. Evil early in
the film, and then Rob Lowe takes over as the Young Number Two.  Rob Lowe's
performance is identical to Robert Wagner's.  Lowe realizes he is not there to
be a comedian, he is there to setup his counterparts and he does it
beautifully.  He sounds exactly like Robert Wagner, and works beautifully with
Myers.  Seth Green is back as Scott Evil, Dr. Evil's son, and his cynical view
of his father just adds to the humor.  Perhaps the biggest and best addition to
the cast came from the smallest member who did not have any lines.  This man,
or midget, is Mini-Me, played by Verne Troyer.  He does not speak, but Dr.
Evil's love for him sets up even more jokes.  Plus, his fight with Austin
Powers is terrific.  Last, Dr. Evil's newest spy in the Ministry of Defense,
Fat Bastard played by Myers, adds to the evil experience.  The constant fat
jokes may seem politically incorrect, but Myers does it with such flair that
you cannot resist laughter.
   What about the other side of the spectrum?  Austin Powers is back, and
once again played by Myers.  In International Man of Mystery, Powers was
the leading man and was hilarious.  He is not quite as funny in this one, but
he still has his moments and Dr. Evil does pick up the slack.  At the beginning
of the film, he is with his with Vanessa, played by Elizabeth Hurley.  But, she
is killed off in the first five minutes, which opens the gates for a new
partner for Powers.  Enter Heather Graham.  She plays Felicity Shagwell and is
the perfect contrast for the humor of Austin Powers.  Unlike Hurley, Graham is
not as reserved and she is just as "randy" as Powers.  And better
yet, Powers has lost his mojo, which makes their pairing all the better.  
   According to Myers, The Spy Who Shagged Me is forty- percent
improv.  This is not that bad, considering how funny the film is, but it can
get a little old at times, but this is nothing but a small problem.  Is there
anything else wrong with this film?  Yes, it is pretty short.  Compared to
other films, this is a short jog at ninety-five minutes.  But, it is packed
with jokes and never loses pace.
   Overall, The Spy Who Shagged Me establishes itself as the
Mary of 1999 and it is a worthy successor.  The randy comedy legitimizes
Myers as a comedic powerhouse and Powers' success at the box office
almost locks up a trilogy for the Powers franchise.  Yeah, baby,
yeah!
Four Stars out of Four Stars
The Movie Page- http://jump.to/moviepage
Reviews, Previews, News and So Much More!

Title
Review for Dick (1999)
Dick, starring Michelle Williams, Kirsten Dunst, Dan Hedaya, Will Ferrell,
Bruce McCulloch, Dave Foley, Jim Breuer and Ana Gasteyer.  Directed by Andrew
Fleming.  1999.
   With the supposed "teen revolution" hitting movie screens everywhere, it is
a shame that such trash as Drive Me Crazy is overshadowing and outgrossing
sharp and witty films such as Dick.  While the premise is a little crazy, Dick
is able to keep its audience laughing through a strong supporting cast that
looks a lot like a Lorne Michaels reunion.
   The two lead roles go to Michelle Williams of TV's popular Dawson's Creek
and Kirsten Dunst, who has recieved raves from such films as Drop Dead Gorgeous
and also her guest role in NBC's ER.  Williams plays Arlene, a ditsy 15 year
old high schooler.  Dunst, not to be outdone, plays an equally ditsy high
schooler by the name of Betsy.  The film takes place during the presidency of
Richard Nixon, in the 1970s.  Arlene and Betsy start off as two outsiders in a
disco world, but slowly evolve.  Unfortunately, as their characters evolve,
they get less and less funny.  Luckily, Lorne Michaels's graudates step in to
carry the load.
   Lorne's reunion in Dick includes current Saturday Night Live stars (Will
Ferrell and Ana Gasteyer), past SNL stars (Jim Breuer, Harry Shearer) and the
stars of Kids in the Hall: Brain Candy (Dave Foley, Bruce McCulloch).  These
cast members provide the slick and slightly irreverent humor that fuels Dick,
especially when Dunst's and Williams's characters lose the charm and hilarity
that they possessed at the beginning of the film.
   Dick starts off fast and furious.  Despite the old "dumb blonde" cliche,
Dick capitalizes on the sheer stupidity of the two main characters, Betsy and
Arlene.  They get their chance to meet Preisdent Nixon when they accidentally
see a confidential list of Nixon paying off certain high office politicians. 
They become "official White House dog walkers."  Plain and stupid comedy like
this is a constant throughout the first half of Dick, and it works due to the
irresistible charm of the lead characters.  Dick never goes political, except
for one funny sequence cocnerning Nixon's thoughts on the war.
   As Dick progresses, however, Andrew Fleming (who directed and wrote the
screenplay) puts his two main characters under metamorphasis.  They hear
Nixon's racial remarks and decide to not put up with it anymore.  While this
may seem like the right thing to do character-wise, it leaves an empty space in
this film because Fleming seems to forget he is directing a comedy.  Enter Will
Ferrell and Bruce McCulloch.
   Ferrell and McCulloch play Bob Woodward and Carl Bernstein, the Washington
Post reporters who originally broke the Watergate scandal.  While not as funny
as Dunst and Williams originally were, Ferrell and McCulloch are able to
suffice for the rest of the film.  Dan Hedaya, who portrays President Nixon to
a dime, gives a strong performance throughout the film.  Fleming seemed to have
trouble transitioning his characters from good to bad (or vice versa), all
except for Nixon, which is why Hedaya is able to give such a strong
performance.  He moves from the mischievous Nixon, trying to cover up
everything, to a paranoid president looking out for every Tom, Dick and Harry
coming his way.  Hedaya's presence is welcome, and such a versatile actor is
very beneficial to such a young cast.
   Dick, overall, is a decent comedy.  The cast is picture-perfect, whether it
be the Lorne Michaels crew pitching in their efforts, or the young duo of
Williams and Dunst portraying their ditsy, out-of-touch 70s high schoolers. 
Dan Hedaya steals the show as Nixon, and had Fleming been able to keep his
characters the same, or transition them better, Dick could have been as great
as 1999's other comedy studs, Bowfinger and Austin Powers: The Spy Who Shagged
Me.
Final Verdict: B-
The Movie Page- http://moviepage.hypermart.net/
Reviews, Previews, News and So Much More!

Title
Review for Dead Poets Society (1989)
Dead Poets Society, starring Robin Williams, Robert Sean Leonard, Ethan Hawke,
Josh Charles and Gale Hansen.  Directed by Peter Weir.  1989.
   The "hero" movie is very common among movie buffs, however, most of these
films are only about sappy and cheap sentimental value.  However, the "hero"
films that tend to stand out are the ones made to perfection.  Rocky and Rudy
are two fine examples, and one more to add to such a prestigious list is Dead
Poets Society, in which a group of boys become men throughout the trials and
tribulations and school.  Terrific performances are turned in by such a young
cast and Robin Williams once again adds his unique sense of humor and drama to
this film.
   With the teen drama so burnt out these days following catrastrophes like
Drive Me Crazy and Teaching Mrs. Tingle, Dead Poets Society stands out like The
Blair Witch Project among the summer blockbusters.  The actors are all mainly
young and in their first big screen roles, and all turn in terrific
performance.  With Robin Williams starring, the movie should obviously flow
around him, yet it does not.  Williams starts the film off strong, but then
gives it off to Hawke, Leonard, Charles and Hansen, just to name a few.
   This young cast should not have been expected to do much, but even so, they
go above and beyond the line of duty.  Such an emotional film calls for
believable acting, among other things, otherwise, it just looks like another
sentimental piece of trash.  The two main roles for the youngsters are those of
Neil Perry (Robert Sean Leonard) and Todd Anderson (Ethan Hawke).  The two play
opposite ends of the rainbow, with Perry acting as the opportunistic student
turned actor and Anderson playing the pessimistic youngster who wants to let
everything out, but turns back to the old way of doing things.  However, the
Dead Poets Society that is formed by the boys turn out the real people beneath.
 They truly enact the theme of the film to "Seize the Day," otherwise known as
Carpe Diem.
   The rest of the cast is terrific, and perhaps the best performance of them
all, comes from Gale Hansen who provides a stunning sense of humor to a film
that may have suffered without it.  Despite being such a meaningful film,
Hansen is able to portray the sense of youth among all of the boys becuase
despite the true intentions of the film, the setting is still in a high school.
   Dead Poets Society also proves why Peter Weir always tends to deliver in his
films.  After seeing The Truman Show, I personally did not think Weir could
outdo that performance, and he comes oh-so-close with Dead Poets Society.  He
consistently delivers in his films, ranging from uniqueness with The Truman
Show to thrilling us with Witness to putting everything into perspective with
Dead Poets Society.  Weir exemplifies good cinema and Dead Poets Society is a
definite for even the mildest of Weir fans.
   Boiling down, Dead Poets Society finishes up strong.  As the film
progresses, the ending becomes pretty predictable, yet Weir is able to
concentrate on the effects it has on the characters, not the actual event. 
This once again enforces the whole point of the film, instead of trying to play
off a sentimental finale.
   Dead Poets Society ranks high up on a must-see list, and for very good
reason.  It provides all different aspects of entertainment and is very hard to
find one bad point with it.  When you finish viewing Dead Poets Society, only
one thought should be left in your head:
Final Verdict: A
The Movie Page- http://moviepage.hypermart.net/
Reviews, Previews, News and So Much More!

Title
Review for Toy Story 2 (1999)
Toy Story 2, featuring the voices of Tom Hanks, Tim Allen, Don Rickles, Jim
Varney, John Ratzenberger, Annie Potts, Wallace Shawn, Joan Cusack, Kelsey
Grammer, Wayne Knight and Laurie Metcalf.  Directed by John Lasseter.  1999.
   Disney has always had a stranglehold on the motion picture animated
industry.  Even in a year with a varied amount of animated movies, including
the satrical South Park: Bigger, Longer & Uncut and the critically acclaimed
Iron Giant, Disney still ruled with another hit in Tarzan.  Disney decided to
throw out another animated feature for 1999, and it is Toy Story 2, engineered
by the geniuses at Pixar, who brought us the revolutionary original, Toy Story
and the clever sophomore effort, A Bug's Life.  Where these two have very minor
flaws, Pixar fixed every one of them in Toy Story 2, which is most likely the
best of the bunch.
   The original Toy Story was a clever movie, but more importantly, it was
revolutionary for being the first major motion picture that was animated
through computer generation.  Movie audiences were enthralled by this, and
despite being a very clever film, Toy Story was overshadowed by its own
benchmark-setting.  A Bug's Life tried to show that Pixar could not only
animate, but make a good film as well.  However, the addition of flowing
backgrounds and more lifelike settings still overshadowed the actual film. 
With Toy Story 2, however, Pixar is able to generate the best graphics yet, but
more importantly, it is overshadowed by a very clever and funny film.
   In Toy Story 2, all of the major players are back, with the addition of a
few others.  Tom Hanks and Tim Allen are back, and impeccable yet again, as
Woody and Buzz Lightyear, respectively.  The rest of the casted voices are
wonderful as well.  Don Rickles (Mr. Potato Head), Jim Varney (Slinky Dog),
John Ratzenberger (Hamm), Annie Potts (Bo Peep) and Wallace Shawn (Rex) are
back from the original, and do yet another wonderful job, plus there are even
more stars providing their vocals for the film.  Joan Cusack (Jessie the
Cowgirl), Wayne Knight (Al the Toy Collector) and Kelsey Grammer (The
Prospector) stand out from this ensemble.  Just like all Disney animated films,
the voice acting is dead on and is one of the most underrated aspects of
Disney's animated features.
   The premise for Toy Story 2 is very simple and easy for children to
understand.  Woody, while saving fellow toy Wheezy, gets caught in a Yard Sale.
 When Al the Toy Collector tries to buy him, Andy's Mom refuses.  However, Al
takes him anyway.  The toys see this, and Buzz, Hamm, Rex and Mr. Potato Head
set out to save Woody.  Woody gets taken back by Al to meet up with some other
toys, Jessie the Cowgirl, the Prospector and Bullseye.  Woody finds out he used
to be the star of a wildly popular children's TV show.  The movie than
chronicles the toys attempt to save Woody and Woody's realization that all toys
do not last forever.
   Unlike a lot of children's films, especially The Adventures of Elmo in
Grouchland, Toy Story 2 does not try to teach a sentimental lesson.  There are
some underlying issues, like friendship and the life span of a toy, but in the
end, Toy Story 2 just tries to entertain us and does a terrific job of it.  The
script is very clever and despite being aimed towards children, adults will
have no choice but to laugh at this wonderful film.
   The original Toy Story was revolutionary, but was not always consistently
funny.  Toy Story 2, on the other hand, is funny and witty throughout all of
the one hour and twenty-five minutes.  For one stretch of the film, Buzz, Hamm,
Rex and Mr. Potato Head are in Al's Toy Store and this is arguably the best
stretch of the film as the quartet interacts with a whole new set of toys,
including Barbie, Rock 'Em-Sock 'Em Robots and the new and improved Buzz
Lightyear.  As said before, the film will appeal to adults, as well as
children, and Pixar accomplishes this without keeping the kids in the dark. 
For instance, one scene has Rex chasing his pals who are driving in a car.  To
the children, it just looks like a silly scene.  To the older audience members,
it is a very clever spoof of Jurassic Park, as Mr. Potato Head checks his
rear-view mirror to see the on-charging dinosaud, just like Jurassic Park.
   In the end, Toy Story 2 cannot help but let you leave with a smile on your
face.  Instead of suscepting to the sequel curse and using stupid humor, Toy
Story 2 improves upon the original and will have you talking about it for days
on end.  The tagline for Toy Story 2 is "The Toys are Back in Town" and if we
are lucky, they will make a few more visits before packing it in for good.
The Movie Page- http://moviepage.hypermart.net/
Reviews, Previews, News and So Much More!

Title
Review for Mummy, The (1999)
Brendan Fraser always seems to have his ups and downs. He can do well at the
box office, as displayed in George of the Jungle, and he can also do bad at the
box office, as displayed in Dudley Do-Right. Also, he can read the critics'
praise, as we saw in Gods and Monsters, but they can also rip him apart, as
seen in Blast from the Past. Now, coming out on video, we have The Mummy. Up or
down?
Well, it is a mix of both. Brendan Fraser's performance is nowhere near Oscar
worthy, but it is suitable for this action-packed film. His sharp wit and
ability to make us believe he is an action star make his performance great in
The Mummy. It was a box office boom and could have done even better if not for
the debut of Star Wars Episode 1- The Phantom Menace. The movie, as a whole, is
entertaining, but ultimately leaves you with a feeling of loss.
The film starts with the "background" of how the Mummy became, well, the Mummy.
This part leaves you utterly confused. However, things will eventually fall
into place. An Egyptologist, played by Rachel Weisz, finds a very ancient map.
Things set into motion from here. But, the film basically seems dry until
Fraser enters. This is when things start to happen. Fraser's performance is
terrific for this particular genre. I had doubts about this film being an
Indiana Jones rip-off, but Fraser sets himself apart. His performance proves
that he is a very versatile actor, and shows Hollywood he can open a movie all
by himself.
Speaking of that, the supporting cast really drags this movie down and probably
would have been better off leaving Fraser all by himself. Rachel Weisz gives an
adequate performance as the historical librarian, but other than that, the cast
is basically there to stand in Fraser's awe. The supporting cast, consisting
mainly of Weisz, Arnold Vosloo and John Hannah, is basically there for comedic
support. Despite Weisz's adequate performance, she has no screen power. She
basically stands there and adds the historical information to Fraser, maybe
chipping a one-liner in once and a while. John Hannah is even worse. He is just
the dumb goofball, supposedly the sidekick, and tells all the jokes. Sure, he
does get a few good laughs in, but mostly, the jokes are just sad and feeble
attempts at humor. Arnold Vosloo, who plays the Mummy in human form, probably
gives the best performance of the supporting cast. Ironically, he has very few
lines, none of which are in English. But, he does demand screen presence,
unlike the rest of the supporting cast. The best moments of The Mummy are when
Vosloo and Fraser are on-screen together, and unfortunately, that really does
not happen until the end.
The graphics in this film are superb. When the Mummy is not in human form, it
is generated with computer graphics from Industrial Light & Magic. The results
are nothing short of beautiful. The computer generated graphics range from the
minute scarabs all the way to the huge sand storm. Combine that with a
entertaining performance from Fraser and a menancing job by Vosloo, and The
Mummy turns into a wonderful popcorn flick.
All in all, most people will enjoy The Mummy. Sure, it does have some aspects
of Indiana Jones in it, but they are few and far between and Fraser's
performance will alleviate any doubts. Besides, I would rather see incorporated
themes of a good movie like Indiana Jones, rather than a bad film like The
Haunting. However, the supporting cast will leave a sour taste in your mouth,
because despite the presence of Fraser and Vosloo, two actors are not enough to
hold up a two-hour action film.
Two And A Half Stars Out of Four Stars
The Movie Page- http://jump.to/moviepage
Reviews, Previews, News and So Much More!

Title
Review for Stuart Little (1999)
STUART LITTLE, featuring the voices of Michael J. Fox and Nathan Lane; starring
Geena Davis, Hugh Laurie, Jonathan Lipnicki, Julia Sweeney and David Alan
Grier.  Directed by Rob Minkoff.  1999.
   Ever since The Adventures of Roger Rabbit, the combination of live action
and computer generated grpahics or animation has always been a big ticket for
studios.  Stuart Little puts a computer generated mouse in the main seat,
voiced by Michael J. Fox, and while it may not be a great movie, it is still
solid and a good view...As long as you have already seen the wonderful Toy
Story 2.
   The curse a lot of "cute" movies suffer is that they are too cute, too fast.
 The Adventures of Elmo in Grouchland suffered from this, but luckily, Stuart
Little manages to keep most of your interest by trying to play Stuart as funny,
not cute.  While these attempts at humor do not always succeed, it nonetheless
is much better than just flashing Stuart's face to get a few "awww"s from the
audience.  This one aspect alone keeps Stuart Little afloat.
   The main cast, aside from Stuart, consists of the Little family.  Mrs.
Little, played by Geena Davis, Mr. Little, played by Hugh Laurie and George
Little, played by Jonathan Lipnicki.  Considering it is a children's movie,
acting does not need to be impeccable.  The cast is sufficient enough,
especially considering that Stuart is on-screen most of the time, and
rightfully so.  The film drags when human interaction takes place, as sad as
that may seem.  Even so, the film moves along at a rapid pace, but still seems
to drag on despite its attempts.
   Michael J. Fox voices Stuart, and Nathan Lane voices Snowbell, the cat who
is Stuart's archnemesis for most of the film.  The interaction between these
two characters brings most of the laughs throughout the film.  The rivalry that
exists brings up some good jokes, and some off-beat humor for the children. 
The reason these interactions are so successful is becuase when humans enter
the scenario, the film takes itself way too seriously.  While most children's
films always have a lesson, this one misses a definite lesson, and tries to
play on your emotions.  Unfortunately, an emotional bond with the characters is
never devloped to extract this type of emotion, that is until the end, and at
that point, it seems the director, Bob Mikoff, just gives up trying.
   The blend of Stuart into his live action enviroment is decently done,
although it does seem very staged a lot of the time.  It is a very difficult
process to act with a ten-inch character who is represented by an "X" on the
floor, and at some points during Stuart Little, this is very noticable.
   Overall, Stuart Little turns out to be an average children's movie.  The
movie takes no children's issue at heart, and tries to be sentimental at the
same time.  As you watch Stuart Little, you want to feel some emotion towards
the characters, and aside from Stuart and Snowbell, all you feel is boredom. 
In the end, however, Stuart Little is a decent film for a rainy day.  Although
Toy Story 2 is the best film out there, and probably worth a second look,
Stuart Little can deliver on some levels, just do not expect the wit and
lessons of Toy Story 2.
The Movie Page- http://moviepage.hypermart.net/
Reviews, Previews, News and So Much More!

Title
Review for Blair Witch Project, The (1999)
The Blair Witch Project
Starring: Heather Donahue, Michael Williams and Joshua Leonard
82 Minutes Long, Rated R for strong language
A great film that has you captivated the whole way through for one of the
most haunting endings in the horror film genre.
   The horror film genre has always been depleted.  Since Hitchcock, we have
never seen a steady stream of truly scary films.  However, the horror film
genre has been resurrected in the 90s, but to no avail.  Scream gave
viewers a spook or two, I Know What You Did Las Summer was just a teen
vehicle, and the latest, The Haunting, is a special effects masterpiece
that forgets that its purpose is to scare us, not have us in awe of the beauty
of the house.  But, we have a true horror film in our midst right now.  The
Blair Witch Project.  It is not a scarefest from start to finish, but as
you shall see in this review, it gets us to believe and then pulls out the
horror.
   This film was made for forty thousand dollars.  You probably could have
only filmed two minutes of The Haunting with that budget.  But, after
seeing this film, we need to be constantly reminded that money cannot buy depth
in a motion picture.  Does this film look like it was made with forty thousand
dollars?  No, it looks like it used even less.  But, this is the bait.  And
once you believe that they are stranded in the woods, and once you believe that
there might be something out there with them, they pull you in.  Hook, line and
sinker.
   The cast is wonderful in this film.  The only way a horror film can scare
you is if they make you believe what is going on.  Alfred Hitchcock did that,
and that is why he is the king of horror.  I am not comparing Eduardo Sanchez
and Daniel Myrick to Hitchcock, but they did do a great job with their cast. 
Heather Donahue plays, well, Heather Donahue.  Joshua Leonard and Michael
Williams also play themselves.  I guess forty thousand dollars cannot buy you
different names.  Or maybe it just added to the realism.
   Heather Donahue is great.  In a present day where leading ladies are hard
to come by, Donahue takes the cake.  The problem with most women taking leading
roles is that they cannot be believable, something this whole film is based on.
 But, Donahue plays the role in stride.  Her character is the one making the
documentary, getting help from Williams and Leonard.  She is demanding, hard
nosed and the leader and I believed it.  
   Michael Williams plays his role terrifically as well.  When the film
starts, you think he will be the minor character.  All he is there for is the
sound.  Well, think again.  He lets his role flourish.  As the group of three
meshes, his role standouts, which becomes much more important as the film roles
on.  
   Joshua Leonard plays the sort of, peace hippie who tries to keep
everything under control.  Surprisingly, he is the first one to disappear.  His
role complements the others as well.  None of the cast stands out because they
all give great performances and they all mesh.  Whatever egos they may have had
were checked at the door because this cast is about getting the film done, not
giving the best performance.  This makes their performances even better.  
   The plot is the best part of this film.  Despite the great acting and
realism, all horror films still need a scary plot.  This one is based on three
filmmakers who want to make a documentary on the local legend of The Blair
Witch.  I will not spoil too much, but lets just say that The Blair Witch is a
person/creature who supposedly killed children years ago.  Then, after
interviewing a few locals, they head out into the woods.
   They start filming in the woods, finding places that are spoken of in the
legend.  They are disappointed, but still film, looking for more answers. 
However, they soon find a portion of the woods littered with The Blair Witch
"symbol."  This is where things start to go wrong.  They start
hearing noises in their sleep; first everyone believes it could be an animal or
some sort of prankster.  But, as they start to believe it could be The Blair
Witch, we start to believe as well.  And as things progress, they lose such
things as the map and Joshua.  That is about as far as I should go, but let me
just say that when you see the ending, prepare for a haunting experience.
   Is there anything wrong with The Blair Witch Project?  Yes, but
nothing major that holds it back from being a four star film.  The only flaws I
saw in this film were with two things.  Mike kicks their map into the river,
claiming it was not getting them anywhere.  At this point in the film, they are
nowhere near crazy, which is why I do not believe this part.  The other flaw is
nothing major and actually enhanced the experience for me.  But, for those of
you who cannot stand shoddy camerawork (i.e. your home movies) then do not see
this film.  The camera goes everywhere and even has times when the screen is
completely black and all you hear are voices.  This added to the realism for
myself, but might make other people just suffer motion sickness.
   Overall, this is the best film that I have seen this summer.  It has
humor in the beginning and then progresses to have you believe the scenario. 
Then it blows your mind with an innovative and haunting ending.  And,
ironically, it is a sharp contrast to the effects laden blockbusters that
plague us every summer.  Fortunately, The Blair Witch Project was made
with forty thousand dollars, plus a lot of heart, hard work and creativity. 
This makes it one of the best films of the summer and of the year.  
Rating: Four Stars Out of Four Stars
The Movie Page- http://jump.to/moviepage
Reviews, Previews, News and So Much More!

Title
Review for Bowfinger (1999)
   Steve Martin was hilarious on "Saturday Night Live".  Eddie Murphy was
hilarious on "Saturday Night Live".  Therefore, we know both of these men can
be hilarious.  Yes, I know, I am the master of the obvious.  Anyway, we know
these men have potential.  However, it seems their movie careers are always a
bit shaky.  For every Dr. Dolittle, Eddie Murphy follows up with a
Holy Man.  But, Bowfinger is a great follow-up.  It capitalizes
on the strengths of each actor and makes for an all out funny film.
   Now, most of you have read my review for Austin Powers: The Spy Who
Shagged Me.  In my opinion, it is the best comedy of the summer.  I gave it
four stars out of a possible four stars.  My review of Bowfinger is
three and a half stars out of a possible four star rating.  Just to reiterate
my Powers review, I do not necessarily mean that this is an epic film. 
Bowfinger, like The Spy Who Shagged Me, is a comedy.  It does not
need Oscar-caliber acting, only a clever script and believable acting.  Now on
with my review.
   Bowfinger is hilarious.  If you have any idea of the movie industry,
you will be laughing throughout the film.  It combines a clever script with
knockout humor.  No matter what kind of comedy you prefer, you will either be
laughing out loud or just chuckling to yourself.  Either way, Bowfinger
is a very funny and enjoyable experience.
   Steve Martin wrote the script and stars in Bowfinger.  He plays Bobby
Bowfinger, a struggling filmmaker who tries to act the posh life of a Hollywood
movie man.  However, he fails miserably.  He thinks he strikes gold when his
accountant gives him a script entitled, Chubby Rain.  Right from the
get-go, the movie makes fun of the typical Hollywood blockbuster.  It moves on
with Bobby Bowfinger trying to give the script to a studio.  He finds a studio
executive, played by Robert Downey Jr., who thinks it is a joke and will only
make the film if Bobby can get Kit Ramsey, the hottest star in Hollywood, to
take the lead role in Chubby Rain.  So, Bowfinger tries to get Ramsey by
trying to act "ghetto" and fails miserably.  But, Bowfinger cannot let his cast
down, so he tells them Ramsey accepted the role.  What is his plan?  To get his
actors to run up to Ramsey and say their lines without Ramsey knowing.  Let's
just say comedy ensues.
   Steve Martin is great in this film.  Not only does he mock Hollywood, but
also he creates clever jokes and funny one-liners that do not necessarily spoof
the movie industry.  This makes it a unique film because it does not rely on
spoof jokes to carry it through all ninety-six minutes.
   Eddie Murphy is back with a vengeance in Bowfinger.  He does double
duty as Kit Ramsey and Jiff, Ramsey's look alike and brother.  He plays both
roles superbly, with a sharp contrast.  Kit Ramsey is a black superstar, and
despite his success, he is a paranoid man who thinks aliens are after him and
that "The Man" is holding him down.  Jiff, on the other hand, is the lovable
loser who gets laughs with his dopey comedy.  Murphy plays both roles with wit
and charm.  His Jiff character falls short at the end, but his role as Kit is
terrific.  This film probably would have been a bust if not for Murphy.  We
believe that Murphy believes aliens are after him, which makes the film even
funnier.
   The supporting cast is great, as well.  They do not get in the way that
much, and feed off the humor of Martin and Murphy.  Christine Baranski plays a
diva, and is funny despite a lack of screen time.  Jamie Kennedy plays Martin's
right hand man, and does it with flair.  He does not go over the edge and just
sets up Martin's humor.  The only member of the supporting cast who does not do
that well is Heather Graham.  She starts off as a wishful actress, leaving Ohio
for Hollywood and asking, "Where do I become an actress?" once she gets off the
bus.  But, she then becomes some sleeping around actress who just wants more
lines.  The transition is hardly believable, and keeps Bowfinger from becoming
an even better comedy.
   Overall, Bowfinger is a must-see.  Besides, Austin Powers: The Spy
Who Shagged Me, Bowfinger is the best comedy of the year.  It is
witty, clever and most of all, unique.  It does not rely on spoof jokes, but
clever jokes as well.  And it is aided by the sharp and hilarious performances
by Steve Martin and Eddie Murphy.  You will not see Murphy and Martin at the
Academy Awards, but you will see them entertaining audiences for the last few
weeks of the summer.
Four Stars out of Four Stars
The Movie Page- http://jump.to/moviepage
Reviews, Previews, News and So Much More!

Title
Review for Mission to Mars (2000)
A review by John Carroll for MISSION TO MARS (2000).
MISSION TO MARS, starring Gary Sinise, Don Cheadle, Connie Nielsen, Jerry
O'Connell, Kim Delaney, Tim Robbins, Elise Neal and Jill Teed.  Directed by
Brian De Palma.  2000.
   Back in 1968, 2001: A Space Odyssey challenged the thought process of all
film-goers.  Stanley Kubrick's masterpiece was hard to understand, until the
end.  It all made sense.  While sitting through Mission to Mars, those who have
seen 2001 beforehand may be expecting the same type of ending.  While the film
does heat up in interest near the end, Mission to Mars still disappoints.
   Brian De Palma really screwed this one up.  Really.  Mission to Mars could
have been many things.  First and foremost, a wonderful popcorn flick with
top-notch graphics and tense moments that could bring the chills of Apollo 13. 
On the other hand, it could have been a great character drama focusing on the
groundbreaking experience of a mission to Mars, and the tremendous pressure of
such a mission.  Or finally, it could have been a mental challenge the likes of
2001.  Instead, De Palma tries to throw in a touch of each, and what he comes
up with is an average film, but considering all of the high possibilities, an
ultimately disappointing one.
   Mission to Mars seems to have three different plots, each corresponding to
the genres stated above.  Separate, the plots would work great.  Put together,
they are absurd.  The overview of Mission to Mars is as follows: Luc Goddard
(Don Cheadle) is leading the first mission to Mars, and the first mission to
land on Mars.  They land, but while inspecting a mountain of rock, a force
generates and strikes from the top.  The entire first crew, excluding Goddard,
is killed.  Did I just ruin a part of the film?  No.  De Palma accomplishes
this in the first ten minutes.  In fact, I already had a question: Wouldn't a
mission to Mars be the talk of not only the United States, but the WHOLE
WORLD?!?  De Palma does not show a launch, the furor of the world, or any
preparations.  All we see is a birthday song to Jim McConnell (Gary Sinise),
the original captain who was scrapped after the death of his wife, and then
'voila' they are on Mars.
   The plot(s) are absurd, but the casting was so perfect that you just want to
believe.  In fact, the cast may be the only aspect of Mission to Mars that
keeps you from leaving during the first hour.  Gary Sinise and Don Cheadle, two
of the most underrated actors in Hollywood, try their best with what they are
given, but the age old lesson is that you cannot do much if you are not given
anything.  De Palma just seems to try and pay homage to sci-fi films of the
days of yore, but insteads he just insults the whole genre by ruining a film of
such great potential.
   To continue this pointless plot, the 'Face of Mars' develops after the
carnage that ruined the first mission.  The rushing of this segment was
horrible, but gave me hope that De Palma was rushing to get to some great
things in the future of the film.  Therefore, a rescue mission is planned.  For
some odd reason, the whole crew is absolutely positive that Luc is alive, and
have no question that he will be once they get there -- over a year later. 
Doubts arise on the rescue mission, but they forge ahead.  I will not spoil
what happens next, but let's just say that De Palma makes a TON of assumptions
for the future of the space program.  The film still drags.  Finally, they get
to Mars.
   When the second crew reaches Mars, De Palma hints at what Mission to Mars
could have been.  Was it an accident?  The way the rest of this film plays, it
probably was.  The film finally hints at other life on Mars, other forms of
habitation.  It may seem absurd, but all sci-fi movies cannot be factually
correct.  This ending segment of the film probes the possibility of life on
other planets, and how similar that life may be.  De Palma takes a different
look than 2001, but once again ruins it.  Kubrick put 2001 all out on the table
and let the audience decide.  De Palma attempts to challenge the viewer and
then in either a stupid decision by him -- or a forced one from studio execs --
has his actors explain everything right after bringing it up.
   At this point, Mission to Mars is all wrapped up in a nice package, although
the package itself is horrible.  Thoughts are brought up, then quickly
explained, alienating the audience completely.  If you want to see this movie,
your pay-off comes at the end.  Goddard, McConnell and Terri Fisher (Connie
Nielsen) enter the 'Face of Mars.'  This segment is absolutely beautiful.  The
effects prior to this is Mission to Mars were good, but limited.  In all
actuality, Mars is like a desert.  While it may take a great amount of effects
and work in front of a green screen, the pay-off is not as good, as say palace
in The Phantom Menace.  However, the 'Face of Mars' and its simplistic holdings
are beautiful.  This phase of the film is wonderful, challenging the life
process and if we are truly alone in the universe.  The pay-off?  Horrible. 
Once again, De Palma goes to an underdeveloped part of the film (in this case,
McConell's deceased wife) and goes for the sentimental touch.  It may have
payed off, but De Palma never went in-depth to the relationship between the
two, or the psychological trauma at her death.  Instead, he feels he is
justified in getting sentiment just because she is dead.  It may work on some
people, but the majority of audiences will feel cheated at such a terrible
ending -- especially since it follows the one extremely enjoyable experience of
Mission to Mars which hinted at what Mission to Mars could have been.
   Mission to Mars tries to be an epic, but obviously comes up short from
everything previous.  However, my one true peeve from this was the film score. 
Fortunately, De Palma did not try to hire big bands to supply the music. 
However, after hearing the corny music (unfortunately for me, there is no other
better way to put it) I would have rather heard the characters spout pure
gibberish just to talk over the innane music.
   When all is said and done, Brian De Palma comes to fault for the debacle
known as Mission to Mars.  Instead of focusing on one aspect of the sci-fi
genre (effects, character drama or challenging thoughts) he tries to do all
three.  Stabley Kubrick was able to pull this off with 2001, but not even De
Palma can be stupid enough to see himself as Stanley Kubrick.  Mission to
Mars's cast hints at what this film could have been, but they cannot rewrite
the script.  The Mission to Mars is mediocre, at best, but 'The Face of Mars'
salvages what is left.  Here's crossing my fingers for Red Planet.
The Movie Page- http://moviepage.hypermart.net/
Reviews, Previews, News and So Much More!

Title
Review for Pleasantville (1998)
I rented this movie with very high hopes. This movie got praise as one of the
best films of 1998, and unfortunately, was not as good as I hoped, but was
still very intriguing and thought provoking.
First of all, the casting for this film is great. Tobey Maguire and Reese
Witherspoon are the future of Hollywood. They play their roles as the Parker
brother and sister perfectly. With a plot as unbelievable as this film, you
need chemistry and honest acting from your cast. Tobey and Reese (Bud and Mary
Sue Parker) play their roles perfectly and display their characters with
honesty and believability. 
William H. Macy, an actor I have grown to love over the past year, turns in
another great performance as the TV dad who is torn over his wife, a "colored"
person and his friends, the "non-colored" ones. He also displays believability
and must display a certain lack of chemistry with his wife. He does this
perfectly and yet again shows why he should be one of the top actors in
Hollywood.
Joan Allen is equally great as Betty Parker, the ideal TV Mom. Her character is
the most ambitious. She is very naďve, and must display this well to make her
character believable and she does just that. Her lack of chemistry with Macy,
which the role calls for, and her developed chemistry with Jeff Daniels is
terrific, and if Daniels would have been as stellar as the rest of the cast,
then this film would even been even better.
As said before, Jeff Daniels gives a bad performance. His character displays
the change going on throughout the town, yet he does not display it with enough
conviction. His character is very confusing and he is not very believable. This
film could have been elevated to a whole new level had Daniels been able to
give a better performance.
The movie is very provocative. It challenges the issues of racism that existed
in the past and that still exist today. I really was not expecting all of the
elements they brought up, but they pulled them off with such flair that it was
mind blowing. They demonstrate the racism issue without a hitch, but do it in a
slow pace.
The only major flaw in the film besides the performance by Daniels is length.
Some films are not meant to be that long. Pleasantville is one of those films.
This film could have been so much better had they not moved so slowly to it.
First, they are amazed by the implementation of color. Then they want to have
it. Then they do not want to. Then the war ensues between the colored and
non-colored. This is all strung out over two hours, which was way too long.
Some movies need a lot of time. Saving Private Ryan was a little bit under
three hours long and I thought it could have used more time. This film is only
two hours long, and seems much longer. Length is everything in films. If you
can nail down the perfect timing and pace, you can win half the battle.
Pleasantville can move at a good pace at times, but it is not consistent
enough.
Overall, Pleasantville is a very pleasant and provocative departure from the
predictability of most films these days. I went in expecting a light-hearted
film about change. I left learning an important lesson about racism and the way
things change. Luckily, Pleasantville teaches this lesson in such a way to make
it appeal to all audiences. Only if it could have done in a shorter amount of
time.
The Movie Page- http://jump.to/moviepage
Reviews, Previews, News and So Much More!

Title
Review for Waterboy, The (1998)
Jim Carrey was regarded as the funniest man in Hollywood. Then, things started
to change. He started doing serious comedy, then moved onto drama. Who was the
torch passed down to? Adam Sandler. But, people thought he might change after
the success of his "normal" comedy, The Wedding Singer, a clever film that did
not rely on Sandler's goofball antics. But, diehard Sandler fans should not
fear, because Adam is back with a vengeance in The Waterboy, a film that gives
us some great laughs, but not consistently.
Adam Sandler is a goofball. He made us roll in the aisles in Happy Gilmore then
progressed to hilariously mocking the 80s in The Wedding Singer. In The
Waterboy, he's back to his Gilmoreish antics. His character, Bobby Boucher is
the waterboy for the local football team, but eventually gets fired. He is a
loser. He watches wrestling, lives with his mom and has he voice of a
twelve-year-old. This character is pure Sandler. Unfortunately, Sandler is not
that good. In the beginning, hearing his voice and seeing his tackles are
hilarious. But, a half-hour into the film, it gets boring. I thought this film
was gonna bomb at that point, but luckily, Sandler's supporting cast delivers
in a big way.
Henry Winkler, The Fonz, is in The Waterboy? I was asking the same question,
but he turns out to have the best performance in the whole film. I thought they
would try to throw in some jokes from Happy Days or do something to make
Winkler somewhat like The Fonz, but he's not. And the audience benefits. He
sets up- and knocks down- a majority of the jokes in the film and makes up for
a mediocre performance by Adam Sandler. Winkler plays the coach of another
local football team, which is much worse then the team Boucher (Sandler)
previously worked for. He hires Sandler to be the waterboy, and then finds out
Boucher's rage on the field. Winkler delivers a great performance, and shines
on the screen every time he appears.
Kathy Bates also helps the cause by making up for Sandler's lacking
performance. She is clever and funny as Mrs. Boucher, Bobby's overprotective
mother. Whether she is try to keep the girls away from her son, or make sure he
is not playing football, Bates delivers in The Waterboy and helps make up for
Sandler's average performance.
The plot is nothing extraordinary. It moves along at a decent pace, although
the film tends to get boring near the last quarter of it. Despite the short
time of the film, it still is too long, because the script is extremely
underwritten. They do not even attempt to write Sandler's character anything
clever. They basically just have Sandler making a fool of himself in an attempt
to get laughs. Sometimes he does, sometimes he doesn't.
The rest of the cast is ordinary. Besides the performances of Winkler and
Bates, nothing else is above average. This keeps the film locked down to
mediocre status. After seeing The Wedding Singer, I expected Sandler to be
great in this film. I was glad to see his return to goofball comedy, but it was
not done right. They should have written his character more and given him some
jokes, not just stunt jokes.
Overall, The Waterboy is a funny movie. It's just not consistent. For fifteen
minutes of the film you may be on the floor laughing and the other you may be
wondering what they're talking about. Either way, if you are looking for a good
laugh, check this film out. It may not be consistent, but it is Adam Sandler
and The Fonz, so just seeing that is worth the price of the rental.
The Movie Page- http://jump.to/moviepage
Reviews, Previews, News and So Much More!

Title
Review for Bug's Life, A (1998)
A Bug's Life
Featuring the voices of Dave Foley, Kevin Spacey, Julia Louis-Dreyfus, David
Hyde Pierce and Denis Leary.
Rated G, 96 minutes long
A very cute and intelligent comedy that outshines its graphics, unlike most
Hollywood films.
   Disney has a way with animated features, otherwise known as cartoons.  Sure,
when we were young we loved cartoons.  "Inspector Gadget," "Teenage Mutant
Ninja Turtles" being two prime examples.  But, as we grow older, we lose touch
with these cartoons.  But, Disney still keeps everyone coming back for more. 
Whether it be the starry eyed children or the frantic parents, a majority of
audiences leave Disney animated films with a positive mind.  In Disney's latest
feature, they turn to the folks at Pixar who brought us the dazzling Toy
Story.  Although A Bug's Life is not as good as its lofty
predecessor, it still provides a unique and entertaining experience.
   To get the familiarities out of the way, the voice casting is yet again
excellent.  Dave Foley, Kevin Spacey and especially Julia Louis-Dreyfus stand
out.  Their voice acting is superb, displaying all of the right emotions and
features.  Plus, Disney still gets some features of each actor/actress into the
looks of their characters.  I have seen this done by Disney for years, and yet
it still amazes me every time.  
   Pixar has done it again.  Despite the tremendous success of Toy
Story, Pixar still needed to come out and show the world it was not a flash
in the pan.  And they did a great job of it.  Overall, the film is not better
then Toy Story, although I doubted it would be.  But, the graphics are
better, and that was the job of Pixar.  In Toy Story, the animations
were groundbreaking.  But, they could have used improvement.  The one major
flaw was that a majority of the backgrounds were still.  However, A Bug's
Life called for lush and moving visuals due to the outside environment. 
Pixar delivered in a big way.  The lush graphics were tremendous with even
little details like grass blowing in the wind.  Simple details like this added
to the beauty of this film.
   The story is pretty basic, with no complexity.  Remember that this is still
a child's film and it needs to be reared for a child to view.  Disney has a way
with these films.  It is basically another David versus Goliath, dumbed down
for a child.  However, Disney is able to make it entertaining.  I know I gushed
on about the graphics, but I could do even more about the plot.  It has cute
humor and wonderful voice acting.  Despite being a children's film, it can be
viewed- and enjoyed- by anyone.  Which is why Disney is the reigning king of
animation.
   You rarely- and I mean rarely- find an animated film over an hour and a
half.  Which runs true with A Bug's Life.  But, that is usually what
makes the film enjoyable.  You can only take so much cuteness and
predictability in one film, no matter whom the film is geared towards.  That
also runs true in A Bug's Life.  The film, despite being short, still
runs its course too long.  The last twenty minutes are predictable, unless you
actually think Disney is going to kill off the main character in a G rated
film.  It drags on, but fortunately, ends with a perk and, fortunately, will
not leave a sour taste in your mouth.
   In conclusion, A Bug's Life is yet another critcal- and box office-
hit for Disney.  A Bug's Life is the perfect example of why Disney is
and always will be the king of animation.  And the help from Pixar certainly
did not hurt it.
Three And A Half Stars out of Four Stars
The Movie Page- http://jump.to/moviepage
Reviews, Previews, News and So Much More!

Title
Review for Analyze This (1999)
John Carroll
Editor/Critic for The Movie Page (http://moviepage.hypermart.net/)
Review of ANALYZE THIS
Analyze This, starring Robert DeNiro, Billy Crystal, Lisa Kudrow, Chazz
Palminteri, Bart Tangredi, Michael Straka, Joseph Rigano, Joe Viterelli,
Richard C. Castellano, Molly Shannon and Max Casella.  Directed by Harold
Ramis.  1999.
   After the buddy comedy Rush Hour, with Jackie Chan and Chris Tucker, Analyze
This was another chance to capitalize on this market.  Directed by Harold
Ramis, Analyze This is able to get similar laughs to Rush Hour, but just like
Rush Hour, Analyze This fails when it strays away from its main duo.
   Robert DeNiro and Billy Crystal play the double trouble team of Analyze
This, and I must admit, DeNiro in this type of comedy is very scary.  I was
skeptical, but DeNiro is able to salvage a slightly above average performance,
mainly because of Crystal's amazing comic wit.  The rest of the cast, aside
from Lisa Kudrow and Molly Shannon, are mainly unknown Italian actors, playing
Paul Vitti's (Robert DeNiro) associates.
   Analyze This is a very funny comedy at times.  And at other moments, it is
downright boring.  It starts off very dull by examining the life of Paul Vitti.
 However, a hilarious sequence between psychiatrist Ben Sobol (Billy Crystal)
and one of his patients, Caroline (Molly Shannon), gets Analyze This back on
the right track.  The interaction between DeNiro and Crystal gets downright
hilarious, with DeNiro being able to play upon his tough-guy image and still
get laughs.  Even better, he gets sensitive, and when that happens, Analyze
This becomes a downright laugh-riot.
   Lisa Kudrow never seems to find the right film.  No matter where she goes,
she still reminds everyone of Phoebe, from the popular TV series "Friends." 
Kudrow tries to surmise a new side of her comic mind by playing Ben Sobol's
wife-to-be, Laura MacNamara.  However, her character comes off stale.  She
plays the fiancee of Sobol, and is very upset and Paul Vitti becomes one of his
patients.  The only times when DeNiro and Crystal do not fully function is when
Kudrow gets in the way.
   Director Harold Ramis (Groundhog Day, Caddyshack, Animal House) adds this
comedy to his already populated list, and while it is definitely not the cream
of the crop, he has had far worst.  Ken Lonergan and Peter Tolan are credited
with the script, and while their interaction of Crystal and DeNiro is flawless,
they fail with Kudrow's character and the mob implication.  Kudrow never gets
any laughs, despite being paired with Crystal and DeNiro, a horrible feat to
say the least.  Also, whenever Vitti's fellow mobsters get involved, laughs are
usually dry.  One exception is Joe Viterelli, who plays Jelly, Paul Vitti's
right-hand man.  Jelly is sorely lacking in on-screen time, but when he does
show up, he always gets a laugh.
   1999 was a great year for comedies.  While Analyze This is not in the range
of Steve Martin's comic masterpiece, Bowfinger, Billy Crystal and Robert DeNiro
play off each other perfectly to deliver another solid comedy for everyone to
enjoy.
Final Verdict: B
The Movie Page- http://moviepage.hypermart.net/
Reviews, Previews, News and So Much More!

Title
Review for Sixth Sense, The (1999)
We have been very blessed this summer. It all started with Star Wars Episode 1:
The Phantom Menace. Despite what you thought of the film, it was still a motion
picture experience we will never forget. Then, we saw Austin Powers: The Spy
Who Shagged Me, which turned out to be better then the original. Then, we saw
the end of Stanley Kubrick's great career. And in recent weeks, we have seen
the Indie sensation, The Blair Witch Project and also the sharp comedy,
Bowfinger. And last, but certainly not least, The Sixth Sense. It is very
comparable to The Blair Witch Project in the fact that they both keep you
interested until the end, and then shock you with very haunting and chilling
endings. They are both great films and very worthy of their four star ratings,
but I would have to give a slight edge to The Blair Witch Project, only due to
the fact that Witch's characters are a little stronger and The Sixth Sense goes
slightly too long, but is still great, nonetheless.
The premise is that Bruce Willis is a child psychologist in Philadelphia. The
film starts with Malcolme Crowe (Bruce Willis) winning an award for his work.
Crowe and his wife go to celebrate, but they are interrupted by an old patient
who broke into their home, played by Donnie Wahlberg. He shoots Crowe and the
film moves on to next Fall. Crowe takes a new patient, Cole Sear (Haley Joel
Osment), who displays the same simptoms of Vincent Gray (Wahlberg). Crowe wants
to help Sear, to make up for his failure with Gray.
Bruce Willis is excellent in this film. He is the prototypical Hollywood actor.
He can do action, as shown in the Die Hard trilogy. And he can also do serious
acting, and he displays that trait in The Sixth Sense. He is completely
believable, which is needed in this sort of film. The premise not exactly
something you hear about every day, so each actor had to have a sense of
believability. And Willis does.
However, compared to Haley Joel Osment, Willis is trash. Osment gives a great
performance as Cole Sear. He is able to display such great amounts of emotional
depth despite his young age. He gives a better performance than I have seen
from other veteran actors. I had heard the hype after the release of The Sixth
Sense that Osment deserved an Oscar nomination. I did not believe it...Until
now, that is. He got such a demanding role, and is able to outshine everyone
else in the film with a terrific performance. And his career can only go up
from here. Some of you may remember him as Forrest Gump Jr. from Forrest Gump.
The rest of the cast is solid and basically just feed off the performances of
Osment and Willis. The reason this film is so good is that it does not burden
you with too many subplots. The main plot is, of course, trying to solve the
mystery of what is bothering Cole. The only other subplots are the relationship
between Malcome and his wife, and the relationship between Cole and his mother.
It is simple, straightforward, despite being so complex and interesting.
Overall, The Sixth Sense is this summer's must-see. Just like The Blair Witch
Project it is cheap and interesting. Also like The Blair Witch Project it is
not as scary as you may think, but character interaction and depth make up for
it in both cases. Expect to see Haley Joel Osment and maybe even Bruce Willis
at the Oscars. The only thing holding those two men (and children) from making
acceptance speeches is their summer release. But, their performances are so
strong the voting committee should still be thinking about them come Oscar
Season. And when you start talking Oscars, you know you have just seen a good
film.
Four Stars Out of Four Stars
The Movie Page- http://jump.to/moviepage
Reviews, Previews, News and So Much More!

Title
Review for Rush Hour (1998)
Rush Hour, starring Chris Tucker, Jackie Chan, Elizabeth Pena, Tzi Ma, Julie
Hsu, Philip Baker Hall, Tom Wilkinson, Ken Leung and Chris Penn.  Directed by
Brett Ratner.  1998.
   The action genre had really gone sour ever since Terminator died out.  Stars
like Jackie Chan and Jean Claude Van Damme had basically made carbon copies of
their previous hits and re-released them under different names.  However,
starting in 1998 with Rush Hour and moving on to hits like The Matrix, the
action genre is gaining new life with unique mixes of stars and plots to add
life to the mindless action that has plagued the genre in the past.
   In Rush Hour, Jackie Chan comes back to the action genre, but brings a
sidekick along for the ride.  No, not some Chinese action king who provides two
lines of dialogue and mindless kicks and punches.  This co-star is one of the
loudest and fastest talking on the silver screen today: Chris Tucker.  Tucker
is a unique choice to co-star in a Chan movie, which adds the thrill.  Tucker's
fast talking and quick humor sharply contrasts Chan's usual dull style.
   Rush Hour starts off fast, and to the naked eye, looks to be the same old
Jackie Chan styler.  Enter Tucker.  Enter fun.  Tucker adds life to Chan. 
Tucker plays Officer Carter, an obnoxious LAPD officer who is cocky enough to
not work with a partner.  Tucker adds explosiveness through his quick wit, an
aspect lacking in most action films.  Instead of relying on the film's action
sequences, director Brett Ratner relies on his duo's compatability, which is
why Rush Hour is so successful.
   Tzi Ma plays Consul Han, who travels to be an ambassdor in the United States
when Hong Kong is relinquished by Britain.  However, when Tzi Ma's daughter,
Soo Yung (Julie Hsu), is kidnapped by Chinese terrorists, crisis strikes and
the plot is set.  When the Consul is upset with the FBI's work, he asks to
bring Agent Lee (Chan) in to aid the investigation.  The FBI does not want the
help, so they get Tucker from the LAPD to figuratively "babysit" Lee and keep
him out of trouble.  However, their contrasting styles will undoubtedly lead to
investigating the case.  The plot may seem mundane, and it indeed is, but Chan
and Tucker are so likable that their personalities overshadow the mediocre
plot.
   The rest of the cast is virtually insignificant.  Sang, the main rival, has
the most significant screen time compared to Chan and Tucker, and if you see
his amount of screentime, you will relaize how dependent Rush Hour is on its
two main characters.
   Comedies like Rush Hour sink or swim based on their attempts at humor. 
Going to watch Rush Hour, the obvious thought is to expect crude minority humor
with the two contrasting ancestries of Chan and Tucker.  While Rush Hour does
play off their differences, it is able to do it with class, taking no low
blows, just connecting with smart humor and the big mouth of Chris Tucker.
   Rush Hour is an action-comedy, so it is not an entire love fest with Chan
and Tucker.  While Ratner's inclusion of action sequences is not completely off
base, it does not completely gel with the fast humor between Chan and Tucker. 
However, when watching Chan perform his stunts, you will still question how
nuts the guy is to do some of the stuff he actually does.
   The action-comedy hybrid may have been at a loss for some time, but Rush
Hour pumps some new life into it.  While it is not a classic that will redefine
the genre, Rush Hour still provides tons of laughter and a few "Whoas" at the
sight of Jackie Chan's stunts.  Chan has found a way to reinvent himself, and
that is the central focus of Rush Hour's success.  What's next?  Maybe the
"Muscles from Brussles" with David Spade?  You never know.
The Movie Page- http://moviepage.hypermart.net/
Reviews, Previews, News and So Much More!

Title
Review for Green Mile, The (1999)
THE GREEN MILE, starring Tom Hanks, Doug Hutchison, David Morse, Bonnie Hunt,
Michael Duncan, James Cromwell, Michael Jeter, Sam Rockwell, Barry Pepper,
Patricia Clarkson, Graham Greene, Jeffrey DeMunn, Dabbs Greer and Harry Dean
Stanton.  Directed by Frank Darabont.  1999.
   After witnessing a film like The Shawshank Redemption, you have to wonder
about two things: first, why the heck does Stephen King write a lot of horror
junk when he has such tremendous ability to write about other subjects, like
The Shawshank Redemption, and second, when are Darabont and King gonna team up
again?  Well, to anyone looking for these answers, take a walk down The Green
Mile, the latest collaborative prison-setting effort from the Darabont-King
team.
   The Green Mile is a prison drama based on Stephen King's six-part serial
novel.  As it goes with most book adaptations, the book is indeed better. 
However, Darabont does such an immense job converting the book to the silver
screen, he stays faithful to King's novel while giving it an entertaining
aspect on the big screen.  While the original book focused on the whole aspect
of prison life and the interaction between the inmates and the guards, the
movie tries to follow that same footing, but also divulges deeper into the
relationship between guard Paul Edgecomb and John Coffey, an immense man
convicted of raping and murdering two little girls.
   Tom Hanks stars in the film, and plays the role solidly.  His performance is
not like the Oscar-nominated roles of the past, but considering the immense
talent of this ensamble, he does not need to be.  Hanks plays the younger
Edgecomb, while Dabbs Greer plays the older Edgecomb.  The older Edgecomb
bookends the film, reflecting on the year of 1935, and as he describes it, the
year of his terrible urinary infection and also the year of John Coffey.  While
this bookending may seem pretty pretentious, considering two of the most
popular films of the 90s, Saving Private Ryan and Titanic, used this method,
The Green Mile, written by Stephen King, follows this method.  And considering
The Green Mile was brainstormed and written before Titanic and Saving Private
Ryan, The Green Mile just sticks to the novel, and is not trying to follow the
rest of the pack.
   With Tom Hanks in the film, The Green Mile automatically was tagged as the
film to beat for the Academy Awards.  And while Hanks's performance may not be
above and beyond this year's competition, The Green Mile will definitely be a
contender this March, if justice is served.  Ironically though, Hanks does not
carry The Green Mile towards near-perfection.  In fact, no member of the cast
truly lead the film, it was definitely an ensemble performance, and a major
success at that.
   The ensemble definitely leads this film, but there are a few breakout
performances that are worthy of note.  First of all, Doug Hutchison is yet
another young actor who should be garnering more leading roles as the Millenium
approaches.  His performance as the evil and cowardly Percy Wetmore is
impeccable, and undoubtedly the best of the film.  He contributes perfectly to
the group, while still making a name of himself.  His Percy is dead on with the
character of King's novel.  Secondly, Michael Duncan, whose only previous major
roles came in Armageddon and A Night at the Roxbury, breaks out of his shell as
the enormous, yet spiritually powerful, John Coffey.  Be sure to note his
initials, because Darabont makes many religious references to Coffey's powers,
which both support and detract from The Green Mile.  And finally, the
impeccable Mr. Jingles.  Heavy advertising has taken place in the past month
for Stuart Little, but if you are looking for real mousey entertainment, The
Green Mile's mascot, Mr. Jingles, is the mouse to see this winter.
   The rest of the ensemble blends in with the rest, and until viewing the
credits, you never notice how many major roles are displayed in The Green Mile.
 Each character, from Tom Hanks's Paul Edgecomb to Gary Sinise's defense
attorney who spends all of three minutes on screen, play a tremendous role
towards advancing The Green Mile to its ultimate destination.
   Is there anything wrong with The Green Mile?  Yes, as minor as they may be,
there are one or two minor flaws, but nothing major.  The first thing that
comes to everyone's mind is the film's running time, but all things considered,
The Green Mile stays entertaining for pretty much all of its three hours.  When
trash like The Haunting has problems even filling up two hours, The Green Mile
is a fresh of breath air as its character interaction and unique entertainment
and sentiment keep everyone interested for the three hour marathon.
   Now onto the flaws.  I, for one, have read the book.  While some may see
that as a disadvantage, because it would prevent me from reviewing the film
fairly, it is actually an extreme advantage in the case of The Green Mile. 
While the film is very good, when it ventures into John Coffey's supernatural
powers, a lot of viewers who have not read the novel will be left in the dark. 
In the end, mostof the loose ends of the fiml are tied together, but it is
fairly vague to some people what is going on, which may lead to their
dismissing Coffey's acts as pure pretentiousness.  However, Darabont tries his
best, and The Green Mile does eventually make sense, just be sure to pay
attention.
   Those flaws may be nitpicking, but in the end, that is all The Green Mile
actualls fails at doing.  It has true sentiment and despite its few lapses into
unbelievability, The Green Mile keeps you entertained for the full three hours
with an unbelievable ensemble cast and a wonderful plot.  As Paul Edgecomb
says, the Green Mile can be "oh so long," but in the eyes of this critic, it is
also 'oh so beautiful.'
The Movie Page- http://moviepage.hypermart.net/
Reviews, Previews, News and So Much More!

Title
Review for Saving Private Ryan (1998)
Steven Spielberg has a way with film. Does the man ever fail? In an era of
Hollywood where CGI is more commonly used then plot, Spielberg manages to tell
his stories in a way to captivate fans of all genres and get his point across.
His latest, Saving Private Ryan, examines World War II, and has the basic plot
of trying to save one man by risking the lives of eight. But, he is able to
tell many other stories and does it with such flair that I am still impressed. 
The film starts off with D-Day, the invasion of Omaha Beach. It is a
twenty-five minute sequence that is the one of the most shocking lengths of
film in motion picture history. There is no introduction, you do not know the
characters, you just see men running for their lives trying to secure Omaha
Beach. For once, war is not glorified. Throughout the film, Spielberg displays
the image of men fighting for their country, but does not glorify the horror
that the men experience in battle. He shows his audience the gruesome aspects
of war, from dismembered body parts to shots in the head. This first sequence
of Saving Private Ryan is not for the weak at heart.
The film progresses to a special mission handed down to Captain Miller (Tom
Hanks) from his superiors. The mission: Miller and his platoon must scour the
lands to find Private James Ryan (Matt Damon), whose three brothers died in
action. Therefore, Hanks takes up his men to start the search. The casting of
Hanks' platoon was terrific. Ed Burns plays the tough-talking Private Reiben.
Tom Sizemore plays the by the rules Sergeant Horvath. Another outstanding
performance is turned in by Adam Goldberg who plays the somewhat cynical, but
humorous, Private Mellish. Through Goldberg's character, Spielberg expresses
the views of the Jewish, who were being persecuted by Hitler during the war.
But, in my opinion, the man who turns in the most unexpected performance and
steals the show is Jeremy Davies who plays Corporal Upham. He is brought along
to translate for the platoon and fight, and thinks of war as glorious battles
and a lovely brotherhood among soldiers. But, Spielberg displays the change he
sees as he experiences true war. 
Tom Hanks, as always, gives a terrific, Oscar worthy performance. His character
is a quiet, yet powerful, leader who is torn between risking his life and his
men's life and his ticket out of the war. But, Spielberg displays through Hanks
the true glory of war. Captain Miller is a man who fights for his country and
follows all orders. Despite his objections, he risks his life and the life of
his men to save Private Ryan and get his ticket back to his home and his wife.
The film progresses with each story developing in a subtle way, yet each
getting their point across. Throughout their journey they fight the impossible
fight, almost break apart and go through such surprising moments, I was
genuinely shocked. We learn of Captain Miller's occupation (I won't spoil it
for you), a wall crashes and it is all of a sudden two opposing platoons with
weapons and no one willing to pull the trigger. Also, they find James Ryan, or
so they thought. And yet through all of this, the whole platoon is able to come
together through bonding and fights, against the enemy and against themselves.
All in all, they find Ryan when they find a way to coexist in harmony through
Hanks' leadership. It is a truly inspiring film, and Spielberg is able to make
the two and one half-hours seem like half that.
Saving Private Ryan is a truly cinematic masterpiece. Throughout the film,
Spielberg expands on one story to tell dozens. He yet again utilizes his entire
cast to portray war as a horrific experience, despite all of the glorifying
aspects of defending your country. Spielberg truly does have a way with film
and yet again shows that he can reach any audience and have them leave with a
truly new thought on life.
The Movie Page- http://jump.to/moviepage
Reviews, Previews, News and So Much More!

Title
Review for Adventures of Elmo in Grouchland, The (1999)
   For as long as time can tell, Disney has always enthralled children and
parents alike.  Whether it be the artful A Bug's Life or the beautiful Lion
King, Disney always has something new, unique and interesting to offer children
and their parents.  For those of you who have not caught on yet, I keep
mentioning parents.  That is because you rarely see six-year-olds attending
movies by themselves.  The parents always tag along.  Part of the reason Disney
is so successful is that they not only entertain children, they keep the
parents involved as well.  For some reason, other studios have not caught on
with this aspect, and if you are looking for a recent example, look no further
than The Adventures of Elmo in Grouchland.
   Elmo has always been a classic character on Sesame Street.  Big Bird and
Cookie Monster always get the headlines, but children are enthralled by the
cuteness of Elmo.  So, it must seem like a great idea to put Elmo up on the big
screen for all children to see.  Wrong.  In The Adventures of Elmo in
Grouchland, Elmo is cute for the first ten minutes.  Then his act gets old,
fast.  Very fast.  You can only take so much cuteness, but The Adventures of
Elmo in Grouchland lays on the cuteness by the handful.  The only time you get
relief is when the ensemble cast of Sesame Street hits the screen for two or
three minutes.  Then it is back to Elmo, yet again.  Part of what made Elmo so
popular was that he never was on screen for that long.  But, he is the main
objective in The Adventures of Elmo in Grouchland and you will find yourself
snoozing before long.
   Obviously this is a children's movie, and despite boring the parents to
sleep, the kids may be entertained.  Although, most of them will not. 
Considering the demographic, not many kids over eight years old will be seeing
The Adventures of Elmo in Grouchland, so the audience is already limited. 
Plus, considering that kids under the age of eight have the attention span the
size of an ant, not many parents will be enthralled by the aspect of trying to
control their kids in a movie theatre for an hour and ten minutes.  It would be
a lot easier for parents to keep their kids under control had this film been
entertaining; unfortunately, the fun only comes in small doses.
   Elmo does lay on the cuteness, but the kids will have some fun once and a
while.  While most of the film is a drag, the kids will certainly being
enthralled by the upbeat song sequences.  Also, when the rest of the Sesame
Street gang make their appearances, which are few and far between, the kids
will get some laughs.  However, considering kids are easily entertained, I
found it a shame that I heard only one or two laughs from the children in the
theatre.
   There are a few bright spots in the film.  As always on Sesame Street, a
lesson is to be had, and this time it is sharing.  Although it is pretty
obvious, and most kids will not even get it anyway, the point is still conveyed
well and if Sesame Street attracted an older audience, perhaps the point would
have been important.  Also, the kids will love seeing their favorite Sesame
Street characters on the big screen, despite losing a lot of time to Elmo, who
basically becomes a screen hog, despite not being Jim Henson's intention.
   Overall, there is not much to say about The Adventures of Elmo in
Grouchland.  Coming in at a skimpy hour and ten minutes, the film is still too
boring to sit through.  It does teach a good lesson, for those young ones who
are intelligent enough to understand, and the flashy song sequences will have
your kids smiling.  But besides that, The Adventures of Elmo in Grouchland are
not that fun and should only be viewed by those children who love the Sesame
Street gang.  Hopefully, they can be mature enough to sit by themselves so the
parents can go see the wonderful American Beauty or entertaining Three Kings.
Two Stars Out of Four Stars
The Movie Page- http://moviepage.hypermart.net/
Reviews, Previews, News and So Much More!

Title
Review for Haunting, The (1999)
The Haunting
Starring Liam Neeson, Catherine Zeta-Jones and Lili Taylor
The Haunting, a film so confusing that it forgets the true meaning of
a horror film: to scare us.
   If you've ever seen a movie, which you probably have considering you are
on this website, you should know about all of the trivia they post before a
movie.  They have things like illustrations and you have to guess the movie or
facts about the film.  But, the one I always like are the "Other
Name" joke that try and rename a particular film.  For instance, the one
playing before The Haunting had different titles for the film, Small
Soldiers.  They had titles like Little Infantry and Can I Get
Those Fatigues in a Smaller Size?  Well, after seeing The Haunting,
I had a few particular names for it as well.  Unfortunately, I can only post
one of them, otherwise, I'd be getting some pretty angry e-mails from
overprotective mothers.  That title would be The Confusing.
   Ok, that is a pretty bad title, but it fits this film perfectly.  It
basically serves up no purpose, and combined with dry dialogue and a boring and
confusing plot, it completes the formula for a cinematic bomb.  Liam Neeson
once again gets wrapped up in a film without any depth, but at least The
Phantom Menace was exciting and had some depth.  The Haunting is
nothing but trash, but unfortunately, will still make a boatload of money. 
   Before I rant and rave about how bad this film is, let me point out the
few, and I stress the word few, bright spots in this film.  First, the house is
great- looking.  It looks beautiful, but this is also a dark spot.  It looks so
great that it is hard to be frightened by it.  This is something that rears its
ugly head at all points of the film.  Things look so great, that you are
looking on in awe instead of being scared straight.  Haunted house films have
to contain one element to even be slightly successful and that is being eerie. 
The Hill House is not eerie.  It is beautiful, but not the least bit
frightening.
   Ever heard of Lili Taylor?  Before this film I did not, but I am glad
that I do now.  She gives the only satisfactory performance in the film. 
Despite the dry dialogue and boring/confusing concept, she manages to light up
the screen every time she appears, but unfortunately, her co-stars are usually
following right behind.
   Owen Wilson, who plays Luke, is the only other cast member even close to
giving an admirable performance, other then Taylor.  He is basically there for
the comic relief, and his character development is poor in all other areas. 
All of the characters are desperately underdeveloped.  Wilson had potential as
Luke, but it seems they just needed him to add a few laughs.  
   Liam Neeson and Catherine Zeta-Jones suffer from the dialogue and plot
and should not have been in this film.  Their characters must suffer from
wicked mood swings because in each scene they turn from ruthless to
compassionate to scared to brave and whatnot.  They just are not believable and
this is the final nail in The Haunting's coffin.
   The plot is terrible.  The opening scene of the film is very important,
but the director makes it too obvious by getting close-ups of all the things
that will play a major role in the end of the film.  As I sat through the film,
I kept wondering what this film was trying to accomplish.  Nell, Lili Taylor's
character, goes from the hunted to the savior.  It makes no sense and the
director gives the audience no reasoning for the ridiculous changes that take
place in the film.  He forces the viewer to make various assumptions and does
not give any in-depth information.  For instance, the beginning of the film
gives us a sense of why Nell is getting involved in the program.  But, we get
zilch for the other four.  Plus, two of them get wiped out in the first ten
minutes.  And the worst part: most horror films have killings.  For some
reason, they kill off Luke at the end of the film.  No reason whatsoever, just
off with his head, literally.
   Overall, The Haunting is the epitome of a bad movie.  Bad plot,
confusing storyline and a waste of good talent.  Hopefully, Liam Neeson can
rebound and get into a good film and be used to his full potential.  Hopefully,
Lili Taylor will be recognized for doing such a great job in such a bad film. 
And hopefully, other horror films, such as The Blair Witch Project and
The Haunting of Hill House, will not be as bad as this one.
Rating: 1 ˝ Stars Out of 4 Stars
The Movie Page- http://jump.to/moviepage
Reviews, Previews, News and So Much More!

Title
Review for Superstar (1999)
   Reviewing movies is such a tough job.  You know, sitting there watching the
movie.  Thinking what is right and wrong.  And the thing that bothers me them
most is that whole part about sitting through the whole movie.  That was the
latest fret I had as I sat through Superstar, an SNL movie that is so blatantly
dumb, it is a shame that it was not intended that way.
   Superstar is based on the Saturday Night Live sketch of Catholic schoolgirl
Mary Katherine Gallagher.  The part is played by Molly Shannon, arguably the
funniest female performer on the current SNL cast.  However, most sketches that
have been put onto the big screen have failed miserably.  Superstar follows in
that path, despite an admirable performance by Shannon.
   The plot of Superstar is pretty simple: Gallagher is a child striving for a
kiss with the stars of Hollywood.  So, she decides she needs to become a
Superstar herself to accomplish this task.  Unfortunately, Superstar
continually strays from this plot and travels into pointless scenes that add
absolutely nothing to the main plot.
   To get one thing out of the way, the performance of Shannon is not all that
bad.  She created the Mary Katherine Gallagher character and does an admirable
job of trying to make the film funny, but one person cannot save a sinking
ship, and Superstar sinks fast.  Will Ferrell, arguably the funniest male
performer on SNL co-stars with Shannon in Superstar as Sky Corgan, the star she
wants to kiss.  Unfortunately, Ferrell gets no laughs.  None.  Undoubtedly, he
has the worst performance in the film.  But, it is definitely not all of his
fault, something I will talk about later.
   The rest of the cast does nothing to add to this movie.  Tom Green, star of
MTV's The Tom Green Show, plays one of Sky Corgan's friends, but just like
Ferrell, his immense talent is wasted in Superstar.  Elaine Hendrix plays
Evian, the snotty and bolemic girlfriend of Sky Corgan and Mary Katherine's
archnemesis.  She tries to make fun of herself, but fails, just like the film
itself.  Harland Williams plays Slater, the guy who has had eyes for Gallagher
all along and Mark McKinney plays the Mary's principal.  They try, but fail. 
The sad part is that this film had the chance to be funny, but the script
continuously fails.
   I just cannot explain it any further.  The script for Superstar is just plan
stupid.  Not stupid funny, like There's Something About Mary, but just plain
stupid, like The Haunting.  The film tries to be to serious with its comedy
and, in essence, denies itself of what it really is: an SNL sketch.  As I said
earlier, the plot continually veres off into terriotory that serves the movie
no purpose whatsoever.  In fact, they even introduce a Maryesque dog to get
some comedy, but it is more pathetic than it is funny.
   In the end, Superstar's laughs are few and far between.  Tom Green has one
hilarious salad sketch, Shannon is clever with her "monologues" in confession
and the Full Monty spoof was probably the funniest part of the whole movie. 
Besides that, Superstar is dull, boring and just not funny.  I have gotten more
laughs out of a regular, ten-minute SNL sketch of Mary Katherine Gallagher than
I did from Superstar.  And on a final note, Gallagher's finger sniffing, which
made her sketch so popular, is done twice in the whole film.  I will use a
quote from Superstar to sum it all up: It "Supersucks."
One and a Half Stars Out of Four Stars
The Movie Page- http://jump.to/moviepage
Reviews, Previews, News and So Much More!

Title
Review for Star Wars: Episode I - The Phantom Menace (1999)
It could never live up to the hype. For over a decade, fans have been clamoring
for the latest installment in the Star Wars saga, and they got it.
Unfortunately, it never had a chance. 
The Phantom Menace never stood a chance. There was too much hype. However, Star
Wars fans should be pleased with the outlook of the other two prequels. If this
were just an ordinary film, I would be giving it a lower grade. However, this
is Star Wars and when you look at it from that context, it all makes sense.
To state the obvious, this film has the most up-to-date visuals in the special
effects industry and it shows. Naboo is beautiful. The Senate Chamber on
Coruscant is mind boggling. The Gungan City is ahead of its time. The visuals
have set a new watermark for the industry and the only film in the future that
looks like it can topple it is Episode 2. 
After the visuals, some aspects of the film falter. But, there still are some
bright spots. Natalie Portman gives a stubborn performance, but its fitting for
what Lucas wanted to show for Queen Amidala. All things considered, Portman
probably gave the best performance in the film. Many doubts were cast on Jake
Lloyd as Anakin Skywalker. He has a solid performance, but nothing
extraordinary. The acting problem arises with Liam Neeson and Ewan McGregor.
Both of these men have extraordinary talents, but it seems Lucas never decided
on whom should take the lead role in the film. It seems both characters never
shine bright, they only cast light rays of hope. In the end, Qui-Gon dies and
leaves McGregor with the task of leading the way in Episodes 2 and 3. 
The dialogue is a bit dry at times, but is not all that bad. My real concern
comes with Jar-Jar Binks and the Gungans. Jar-Jar, to put it simply, is the
most annoying motion picture character I have encountered. The choice to give
him a strange language is good, but if you lose your attention for one minute
when he is speaking, you will be totally lost. The Gungans were not that bad.
They play a huge role in the end of the film during the battle with the Droid
Army, but the kiddy factor comes into play. If you watch closely, you will see
the battlefield strewn with dead warriors. However, if you look at these
bodies, ninety-five percent of them belong to the droids. Then, the Gungans
retreat. It seems Lucas did not want to "upset" the children by killing off
many Gungans. Of course, no kids will realize this aspect which tailors to
children, but makes the scene totally unbelievable to the mature viewer, which
most Star Wars fans are.
The last factor to consider is that this is Star Wars. This alone makes the
film entertaining. John Williams' score for the film is once again amazing and
adds a whole new dimension to The Phantom Menace. It is a great feeling to see
Darth Maul appear on the screen and then hear "Duel of the Fates" start
blasting across the theatre. The lightsaber battles are tremendous. This is
nothing like the first battle in A New Hope with Obi-Wan and Vader practically
just standing around and hitting sabers. The lightsaber fights are well
choreographed and Ray Park and McGregor show off their agility with perfection.
All in all, The Phantom Menace turns out to be an entertaining film. Star Wars
has never been known for terrific acting or spicy dialogue. At best, it's a
little bit above average. But, it is still Star Wars and it is the first
episode of a new trilogy. With work, the trilogy will progressively get better
and we, the fans, will benefit the most.
Three Stars Out of Four Stars
The Movie Page- http://jump.to/moviepage
Reviews, Previews, News and So Much More!

Title
Review for Austin Powers: The Spy Who Shagged Me (1999)
Star Wars Episode 1: The Phantom Menace Soundtrack: (4 out of 4)
John Williams is still an absolute genius. Despite Episode 1 falling short of
the original trilogy, John Williams does not fail with his soundtrack. It is
yet another masterpiece to add to his collection and is a must have for any fan
of Williams, Star Wars or just a fan of good music.
Just to clarify: I am not a classical music fan. In my opinion Mozart and
Beethoven cannot even hold a candle to Fred Durst and Beck Hansen. However,
John Williams just does something with his music to hook me in. When you listen
to this soundtrack, you bring up the memories of the film and the events that
took place. Unlike other blockbuster films that try to feature top-40 boy bands
with their music, Lucas utilizes Williams' soundtrack as a tool. Williams does
not try to outdo the movie, he just works his music into it. 
What most people do not know is that Williams' soundtrack for the Star Wars
trilogy is continuous. That means that it basically plays throughout the film.
This is a testament to Williams' genius because he is subtle, yet powerful.
Whether it be the heart-pumping thrill of "Duel of the Fates" or the subtle,
soothing sound of "Anakin's Theme," Williams is able to display the right
emotions in his soundtrack. The only gripe I could find with this soundtrack is
that it is re-ordered. It is a continuous soundtrack, but the tracks are all
re-organized. It would have been better if the soundtrack was organized to play
as it had in the movie. But trust me, we'll live.
So in a day and age where movie soundtracks only sell with big headliners, John
Williams comes in and breaks the mold. Not only does he create terrific music,
but he is also able to do it throughout the whole film. In fact, this beautiful
soundtrack can give you a better feeling of the film as a whole. If you get
this soundtrack, see the movie after listening because you will have a greater
appreciation for it.
Austin Powers: The Spy Who Shagged Me Soundtrack: (2 1/2 Out of 4)
Let's just call this a reversal of the above review. While the soundtrack
outdid the movie in quality for The Phantom Menace, it is just the opposite for
The Spy Who Shagged Me. The movie was great; the soundtrack is only a little
bit above average. 
The soundtrack starts off with a bang with Madonna's "Beautiful Stranger." It's
always a risk to just slap a big name artist on a soundtrack (which I'll get to
later), but Madonna is great in this song and it is a great way to start this
soundtrack. The Who provide "My Generation" and R.E.M. does a good job on their
remake of "Draggin' The Line." However, things go downhill from there.
Lenny Kravitz provides a ho-hum performance on his remake on Guess Who's
"American Woman." Scary Spice is next with "Word Up," which is the worst song
on this soundtrack. These two songs are the epitome of blockbuster soundtracks.
In the film, they do not play either Kravitz or Scary's song. In fact, they
actually play the original Guess Who version instead of Kravitz's! Anyway,
soundtracks are meant to complement the film, not just be thrown in while the
credits are playing.
The rest of the soundtrack goes on in a mild pace. The bright spots? Dr. Evil's
hilarious remake of Will Smith's "Just the Two of Us." Green Day also appears
with an instrumental entitled "Espionage" that was surprisingly good. And Burt
Bacharach and Elvis Costello, who appear in the film to perform, do an
admirable job with "I'll Never Fall In Love Again."
Overall, this is a decent soundtrack. But, it seems they went with big,
blockbuster names and luckily got good performances from them. If you liked the
movie, you'll probably like the soundtrack. If you are a fan of any the artists
(excluding Kravitz and Scary) then you'll also enjoy it. Otherwise, stay away.
The Movie Page- http://jump.to/moviepage
Reviews, Previews, News and So Much More!
